Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2193.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 62 O.S. 2021, Section 3103, as
last amended by Section 2, Chapter 361, O.S.L. 2024 (62 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 3103), is amended to read as follows:
Section 3103. As used in the Oklahoma Pension Legislation
Actuarial Analysis Act:
1. "Amendment" means any amendment, including a substitute
bill, made to a retirement bill by any committee of the House of
Representatives or Senate, any conference committee of the House or
Senate or by the House or Senate;
2. "RB number" means that number preceded by the letters "RB"
assigned to a retirement bill by the respective staffs of the
Oklahoma State Senate and the Oklahoma House of Representatives when
the respective staff office prepares a retirement bill for a member
of the Legislature;
3. "Legislative Actuary" means the firm or entity that enters
into a contract with the Legislative Service Bureau pursuant to
Req. No. 16491 Page 2

RBH No. 16491
Sect ion 452.15 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes to provide the
actuarial services and other duties provided for in the Oklahoma
Pension Legislation Actuarial Analysis Act;
4. "Nonfiscal amendment" means an amendment to a retirement
bill having a fiscal impact, which amendment does not change any
factor of an actuarial investigation specified in subsection A of
Section 3109 of this title;
5. "Nonfiscal retirement bill" means a retirement bill:
a. which does not affect the cost or funding factors of a
retirement system,
b. which affects such factors only in a manner which does
not:
(1) grant a benefit increase under the retirement
system affected by the bill,
(2) create an actuarial accrued liability for or
increase the actuarial accrued liability of the
retirement system affected by the bill, or
(3) increase the normal cost of the retirement system
affected by the bill,
c. which authorizes the purchase by an active member of
the retirement system, at the actuarial cost for the
purchase as computed pursuant to the statute in effect
on the effective date of the measure allowing such
purchase, of years of service for purposes of reaching
Req. No. 16491 Page 3

RBH No. 16491
a normal retirement date in the applicable retirement
system, but which cannot be used in order to compute
the number of years of service for purposes of
computing the retirement benefit for the member,
d. which provides for the computation of a service-
connected disability retirement benefit for members of
the Oklahoma Law Enforcement Retirement System
pursuant to Section 2-305 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma
Statutes if the members were unable to complete twenty
(20) years of service as a result of the disability,
e. which requires membership in the defined benefit plan
authorized by Section 901 et seq. of Title 74 of the
Oklahoma Statutes for persons whose first elected or
appointed service occurs on or after November 1, 2018,
if such persons had any prior service in the Oklahoma
Public Employees Retirement System prior to November
1, 2015,
f. which provides for a one-time increase in retirement
benefits if the increase in retirement benefits is not
a permanent increase in the gross annual retirement
benefit payable to a member or beneficiary, occurs
only once pursuant to a single statutory authorization
and does not exceed:

Req. No. 16491 Page 4

RBH No. 16491
(1) the lesser of two percent (2%) of the gross
annual retirement benefit of the member or One
Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) and requires that
the benefit may only be provided if the funded
ratio of the affected retirement system would not
be less than sixty percent (60%) but not greater
than eighty percent (80%) after the benefit
increase is paid,
(2) the lesser of two percent (2%) of the gross
annual retirement benefit of the member or One
Thousand Two Hundred Dollars ($1,200.00) and
requires that the benefit may only be provided if
the funded ratio of the affected retirement
system would be greater than eighty percent (80%)
but not greater than one hundred percent (100%)
after the benefit increase is paid,
(3) the lesser of two percent (2%) of the gross
annual retirement benefit of the member or One
Thousand Four Hundred Dollars ($1,400.00) and
requires that the benefit may only be provided if
the funded ratio of the affected retirement
system would be greater than one hundred percent
(100%) after the benefit increase is paid, or

Req. No. 16491 Page 5

RBH No. 16491
(4) the greater of two percent (2%) of the gross
annual retirement benefit of the volunteer
firefighter or One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) for
persons who retired from the Oklahoma
Firefighters Pension and Retirement System as
volunteer firefighters and who did not retire
from the Oklahoma Firefighters Pension and
Retirement System as a paid firefighter.
As used in this subparagraph, "funded ratio" means the
figure derived by dividing the actuarial value of
assets of the applicable retirement system by the
actuarial accrued liability of the applicable
retirement system,
g. which modifies the disability pension standard for
police officers who are members of the Oklahoma Police
Pension and Retirement System as provided by Section
50-115 of Title 11 of the Oklahoma Statutes,
h. which provides a cost-of-living benefit increase
pursuant to the provisions of:
(1) Section 49-143.7 of Title 11 of the Oklahoma
Statutes,
(2) Section 50-136.9 of Title 11 of the Oklahoma
Statutes,

Req. No. 16491 Page 6

RBH No. 16491
(3) Section 1104K of Title 20 of the Oklahoma
Statutes,
(4) Section 2-305.12 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma
Statutes,
(5) Section 17-116.22 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma
Statutes,
(6) Section 930.11 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma
Statutes,
i. which modifies the computation of the line-of-duty
disability benefit pursuant to the provisions of this
section and Sections 50-101 and 50-115 of Title 11 of
the Oklahoma Statutes, or
j. which authorizes membership in the Oklahoma Law
Enforcement Retirement System for active commissioned
or CLEET-certified agents of the Office of the
Attorney General or the Military Department of the
State of Oklahoma pursuant to Sections 3 2-309.9 and 4
2-309.10 of this act Title 47 of the Oklahoma
Statutes, or
k. which provides a cost-of-living benefit increase
pursuant to Sections 2 through 7 of this act.
A nonfiscal retirement bill shall include any retirement bill that
has as its sole purpose the appropriation or distribution or
redistribution of monies in some manner to a retirement system for
Req. No. 16491 Page 7

RBH No. 16491
purp oses of reducing the unfunded liability of such system or the
earmarking of a portion of the revenue from a tax to a retirement
system or increasing the percentage of the revenue earmarked from a
tax to a retirement system;
6. "Reduction-in-cost amendment" means an amendment to a
retirement bill having a fiscal impact which reduces the cost of the
bill as such cost is determined by the actuarial investigation for
the bill prepared pursuant to Section 3109 of this title;
7. "Retirement bill" means any bill or joint resolution
introduced or any bill or joint resolution amended by a member of
the Legislature which creates or amends any law directly affecting a
retirement system. A retirement bill shall not mean a bill or
resolution that impacts the revenue of any state tax in which a
portion of the revenue generated from such tax is earmarked for the
benefit of a retirement system;
8. "Retirement bill having a fiscal impact" means any
retirement bill creating or establishing a retirement system and any
other retirement bill other than a nonfiscal retirement bill; and
9. "Retirement system" means the Teachers' Retirement System of
Oklahoma, the Oklahoma Public Employees Retirement System, the
Uniform Retirement System for Justices and Judges, the Oklahoma
Firefighters Pension and Retirement System, the Oklahoma Police
Pension and Retirement System, the Oklahoma Law Enforcement

Req. No. 16491 Page 8

RBH No. 16491
Reti rement System, or a retirement system established after January
1, 2006.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 49-143.8 of Title 11, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Except as provided in subsection B of this section and
except for persons receiving benefits pursuant to Section 49-101 of
Title 11 of the Oklahoma Statutes, any member receiving benefits
from the Oklahoma Firefighters Pension and Retirement System as of
June 30, 2026, who continues to receive benefits on or after July 1,
2026, shall receive an increase in benefits as follows:
1. Zero percent (0%) if the member retired after June 30, 2023;
2. Two percent (2%) for the first Sixty Thousand Dollars
($60,000.00) of the member's gross annual retirement benefit if the
member retired after June 30, 2018, but before July 1, 2023; and
3. Four percent (4%) for the first Sixty Thousand Dollars
($60,000.00) of the member's gross annual retirement benefit if the
member retired before July 1, 2018.
B. Any increase in benefits a person is eligible to receive
pursuant to repealed Section 49-136 of Title 11 of the Oklahoma
Statutes after June 30, 2020, shall be used to offset the increase
in benefits provided in subsection A of this section.


Req. No. 16491 Page 9

RBH No. 16491
C. Effective July 1, 2026, any person receiving benefits
pursuant to Section 49-101 of Title 11 of the Oklahoma Statutes
shall each receive:
1. No increase if the member retired after June 30, 2023;
2. Two percent (2%) for the first Sixty Thousand Dollars
($60,000.00) of the member's gross annual retirement benefit if the
member retired after June 30, 2018, but before July 1, 2023; and
3. Four percent (4%) for the first Sixty Thousand Dollars
($60,000.00) of the member's gross annual retirement benefit if the
member retired before July 1, 2018.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 50-136.10 of Title 11, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Except as provided in subsection B of this section, any
member receiving benefits from the Oklahoma Police Pension and
Retirement System as of June 30, 2026, who continues to receive
benefits on or after July 1, 2026, shall receive an increase in
benefits as follows:
1. Zero percent (0%) if the member retired after June 30, 2023;
2. Two percent (2%) for the first Sixty Thousand Dollars
($60,000.00) of the member's gross annual retirement benefit if the
member retired after June 30, 2018, but before July 1, 2023; and


Req. No. 16491 Page 10

RBH No. 16491
3. Four percent (4%) for the first Sixty Thousand Dollars
($60,000.00) of the member's gross annual retirement benefit if the
member retired before July 1, 2018.
B. Any increase in benefits a person is eligible to receive
pursuant to repealed Section 50-120 of Title 11 of the Oklahoma
Statutes, after June 30, 2020, shall be offset by the increase in
benefits, if any, provided by this section.
SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1104L of Title 20, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Any member receiving benefits from the Uniform Retirement System
for Justices and Judges as of June 30, 2026, who continues to
receive benefits on or after July 1, 2026, shall receive an increase
in benefits as follows:
1. Zero percent (0%) if the member retired after June 30, 2023;
2. Two percent (2%) for the first Sixty Thousand Dollars
($60,000.00) of the member's gross annual retirement benefit if the
member retired after June 30, 2018, but before July 1, 2023; and
3. Four percent (4%) for the first Sixty Thousand Dollars
($60,000.00) of the member's gross annual retirement benefit if the
member retired before July 1, 2018.
SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2-305.13 of Title 47, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Req. No. 16491 Page 11

RBH No. 16491
A. Except as provided in subsection B of this section, any
member receiving benefits from the Oklahoma Law Enforcement
Retirement System as of June 30, 2026, who continues to receive
benefits on or after July 1, 2026, shall receive an increase in
benefits as follows:
1. Zero percent (0%) if the member retired after June 30, 2023;
2. Two percent (2%) for the first Sixty Thousand Dollars
($60,000.00) of the member's gross annual retirement benefit if the
member retired after June 30, 2018, but before July 1, 2023; and
3. Four percent (4%) for the first Sixty Thousand Dollars
($60,000.00) of the member's gross annual retirement benefit if the
member retired before July 1, 2018.
B. Any increase in benefits a person is eligible to receive
pursuant to subsection B, C, or D of Section 2-305 of Title 47 of
the Oklahoma Statutes after July 1, 2026, shall be offset by the
increase in benefits, if any, provided by this section.
SECTION 6. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 17-116.23 of Title 70, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Any person receiving benefits from the Teachers' Retirement
System of Oklahoma as of June 30, 2026, who continues to receive
benefits on or after July 1, 2026, shall receive an increase in
benefits as follows:
1. Zero percent (0%) if the member retired after June 30, 2023;
Req. No. 16491 Page 12

RBH No. 16491
2. Two percent (2%) for the first Sixty Thousand Dollars
($60,000.00) of the member's gross annual retirement benefit if the
member retired after June 30, 2018, but before July 1, 2023; and
3. Four percent (4%) for the first Sixty Thousand Dollars
($60,000.00) of the member's gross annual retirement benefit if the
member retired before July 1, 2018.
SECTION 7. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 930.12 of Title 74, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Any member receiving benefits from the Oklahoma Public Employees
Retirement System as of June 30, 2026, who continues to receive
benefits on or after July 1, 2026, shall receive an increase in
benefits as follows:
1. Zero percent (0%) if the member retired after June 30, 2023;
2. Two percent (2%) for the first Sixty Thousand Dollars
($60,000.00) of the member's gross annual retirement benefit if the
member retired after June 30, 2018, but before July 1, 2023; and
3. Four percent (4%) for the first Sixty Thousand Dollars
($60,000.00) of the member's gross annual retirement benefit if the
member retired before July 1, 2018.
SECTION 8. AMENDATORY 20 O.S. 2021, Section 1103, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1103. A. Effective September 1, 2005 On or after the
effective date of this act, each Justice or judge who is a member of
Req. No. 16491 Page 13

RBH No. 16491
The Uniform Retirement System for Justices and Judges shall have
eight percent (8%) of the first Ninety Thousand Dollars ($90,000.00)
of his or her current monthly salary or, for a member who is a
participating member of The Uniform Retirement System for Justices
and Judges on the effective date of this act, a minimum of eight
percent (8%) of his or her current monthly salary on the effective
date of this act, whichever is greater, withheld by the State of
Oklahoma and deposited in a fund in the State Treasury which is
hereby created and shall be known as the Oklahoma Judicial
Retirement Fund. If a Justice or judge shall cease to be a Justice
or judge of the above-mentioned courts, for any reason, before he or
she has accumulated eight (8) years of accredited service, or dies
after he or she has accumulated eight (8) years' service and having
no survivor benefit, then all the contributions retained from his or
her salary shall be paid to him or her or his or her named
beneficiary, or his or her estate in case of no named beneficiary,
and he or she shall have no further claim against the State of
Oklahoma for retirement pay for his or her services to date.
B. Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, the
compensation taken into account for any judge or Justice in
determining contributions or benefit accruals for any plan year is
limited to the annual compensation limit under Section 401(a)(17) of
the federal Internal Revenue Code.

Req. No. 16491 Page 14

RBH No. 16491
C. Upon death of a retired judge who has no survivor benefits,
there shall be paid to his or her named beneficiary, or his or her
estate in case of no named beneficiary, an amount equal to the
excess, if any, of his or her accumulated contributions over the sum
of all retirement benefit payments made.
D. Upon the death of a retired member, the benefit payment for
the month in which the retired member died, if not previously paid,
shall be made to the estate of the member or to the member's
beneficiary if there is no estate. Such benefit payment shall be
made in an amount equal to a full monthly benefit payment regardless
of the day of the month in which the retired member died.
SECTION 9. AMENDATORY 20 O.S. 2021, Section 1103.1, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1103.1. A. On and after January 1, 2001, the
Administrative Director of the Courts, in addition to the members'
contributions, shall transfer monthly amounts for deposit in the
State Judicial Retirement Fund as set out in Section 1309 of this
title equal to two percent (2.0%) of the monthly total actual paid
gross salaries of the members of the Uniform Retirement System for
Justices and Judges. Effective July 1, 2005 On or after the
effective date of this act, such amounts transferred by the
Administrative Director of the Courts shall be as follows:
Fiscal Year Ending Percentage of Contribution
June 30, 2006 3.0%
Req. No. 16491 Page 15

RBH No. 16491
June 30, 2007 4.0%
June 30, 2008 5.5%
June 30, 2009 7.0%
June 30, 2010 8.5%
June 30, 2011 10.0%
June 30, 2012 11.5%
June 30, 2013 13.0%
June 30, 2014 14.5%
June 30, 2015 16.0%
June 30, 2016 17.5%
June 30, 2017 19.0%
June 30, 2018 20.5%
June 30, 2019 and thereafter 22.0%
for the first Ninety Thousand Dollars ($90,000.00) or, for a member
who is a participating member of the System on the effective date of
this act, for his or her current monthly salary on the effective
date of this act, whichever is greater.
B. The State Judicial Retirement Fund should have a funded
ratio at or near ninety percent (90%) or be receiving sufficient
contributions to amortize any unfunded liability of the fund
according to the amortization schedule adopted by the Board of
Trustees of the Oklahoma Public Employees Retirement System. The
Board of Trustees shall provide a copy of the annual actuarial
report to the Governor, the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court, the
Req. No. 16491 Page 16

RBH No. 16491
Spea ker of the House of Representatives and the President Pro
Tempore of the Senate. In addition to this report, the Board shall
provide a letter setting forth the amount of the actuarially
required contributions for the System and any other recommendations
that the Board may deem necessary.
C. The Administrative Director of the Courts shall remit to the
System all statutorily required retirement contributions due on a
monthly basis. All required court and employee contributions and
supporting documentation are due and must be received by the System
on or before the fifteenth day of the month following the month for
which the contributions are due. Court and employee contributions
remitted to the System after thirty (30) days from the above due
date shall be subject to a monthly late charge of one and one-half
percent (1.5%) of the unpaid balance to be paid by the
Administrative Director of the Courts to the System.
D. On or after the effective date of this act, any amount of
money not required for purposes of the employer contribution
otherwise provided by this section shall be transferred to the
Special Cash Fund to be used for such purposes as may be provided by
law including, but not limited to, any purpose prescribed by an
appropriation measure enacted during any regular or extraordinary
session of the Legislature.
SECTION 10. AMENDATORY 20 O.S. 2021, Section 1104, is
amended to read as follows:
Req. No. 16491 Page 17

RBH No. 16491
Section 1104. A. For purposes of this section, salary for the
calculation of benefits shall be:
1. For participating members of The Uniform Retirement System
for Justices and Judges on or after the effective date of this act,
the first Ninety Thousand Dollars ($90,000.00) of the member's
annual compensation or the member's annual compensation on the
effective date of this act, whichever is greater; or
2. For members who join the System on or after the effective
date of this act, the first Ninety Thousand Dollars ($90,000.00) of
the member's annual compensation.
B. Each justice or judge who is a member of The Uniform
Retirement System for Justices and Judges upon retirement after June
30, 2004, shall be entitled to receive as retirement compensation,
until changed by the Legislature, an annual amount, each monthly
payment of which shall be in an amount equal to four percent (4%) of
the average monthly salary received by him or her as a justice or
judge based on the highest three (3) years of active service
multiplied by the number of total years of service and reduced
according to the elected survivor option, if any. The amounts of
compensation reported to the Oklahoma Public Employees Retirement
System for the Uniform Retirement System for Justices and Judges, by
the Office of Management and Enterprise Services prior to June 30,
2004, may be conclusively presumed as valid regarding the source of
the compensation reported as salary for purposes of the accuracy of
Req. No. 16491 Page 18

RBH No. 16491
the employees' contributions and the computation of salary for the
calculation of benefits. This presumption shall not include any
computation error made by the Office of Management and Enterprise
Services or the Oklahoma Public Employees Retirement System on
behalf of the Uniform Retirement System for Justices and Judges.
Provided, however, that no justice or judge retiring after June 30,
2004, may receive a monthly retirement benefit in excess of one
hundred percent (100%) of the average monthly salary based on the
highest three (3) years of active service and found applicable to
such justice or judge at the time of retirement. Retirement
compensation shall be payable monthly out of the State Judicial
Retirement Fund by warrants prepared by the Executive Director of
the Public Employees Retirement System and issued by the State
Treasurer.
SECTION 11. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 17-101, as
last amended by Section 1, Chapter 300, O.S.L. 2024 (70 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 17-101), is amended to read as follows:
Section 17-101. The following words and phrases as used in
Section 17-101 et seq. of this title, unless a different meaning is
clearly required by the context, shall have the following meanings:
1. "Retirement system" shall mean the Teachers' Retirement
System of Oklahoma, as defined in Section 17-102 of this title;
2. "Public school" shall mean a school district, a state
college or university, the State Board of Education, the State Board
Req. No. 16491 Page 19

RBH No. 16491
of C areer and Technology Education, and any other state educational
entity conducted within the state supported wholly or partly by
public funds and operating under the authority and supervision of a
legally constituted board or agency having authority and
responsibility for any function of public education. Public school
shall also mean a tuition-free, nonprofit alternative school of
choice that provides education, therapeutic counseling, and outreach
programs which is aligned with a school district and which receives
grant funds from governmental sources;
3. "Classified personnel" shall mean any teacher, principal,
superintendent, supervisor, administrator, librarian, certified or
registered nurse, college professor, or college president whose
salary is paid wholly or in part from public funds. An employee of
any state department, board, board of regents, or board of trustees,
who is in a supervisory or an administrative position, the function
of which is primarily devoted to public education, shall be
considered classified personnel under the meaning of Section 17-101
et seq. of this title, at the discretion of the Board of Trustees of
the Teachers' Retirement System of Oklahoma. The term "teacher"
shall also include instructors and counselors employed by the
Department of Corrections and holding valid teaching certificates
issued by the State Department of Education. Provided, that a
person employed by the Department of Corrections as an instructor or
counselor shall have been actively engaged in the teaching
Req. No. 16491 Page 20

RBH No. 16491
prof ession for a period not less than three (3) years prior to
employment to be eligible to participate in the Teachers' Retirement
System of Oklahoma. The Department of Corrections shall contribute
the employer's share to the Teachers' Retirement System of Oklahoma;
4. "Nonclassified optional personnel" shall include persons
hired as adjunct teachers pursuant to subsection G of Section 6-
122.3 of this title, cooks, janitors, maintenance personnel not in a
supervisory capacity, bus drivers, noncertified or nonregistered
nurses, noncertified librarians, and clerical employees of the
public schools, state colleges, universities, or any state
department, board, board of regents, or board of trustees, the
functions of which are primarily devoted to public education and
whose salaries are paid wholly or in part from public funds;
5. "Employer" shall mean the state and any of its designated
agents or agencies with responsibility and authority for public
education, such as boards of education of elementary and independent
school districts, boards of regents, boards of control, or any other
agency of and within the state by which a person may be employed for
service in public education. Employer shall also mean the board of
directors of a tuition-free, nonprofit alternative school of choice
that provides education, therapeutic counseling, and outreach
programs which is aligned with a school district and which receives
grant funds from governmental sources;

Req. No. 16491 Page 21

RBH No. 16491
6. "Member" shall mean any teacher or other employee included
in the membership of the system as provided in Section 17-103 of
this title;
7. "Board of Trustees" shall mean the board provided for in
Section 17-106 of this title to administer the retirement system;
8. "Prior service" shall mean withdrawn service, provided:
a. before July 1, 2021, prior service shall exclude
service attributable to any membership period during
which nonclassified optional members voluntarily
ceased contributions while remaining employed in
public education or voluntarily withdrew from
membership in the System, and
b. on and after July 1, 2021, prior service shall exclude
service attributable to any period of time during
which nonclassified optional members opted out of
membership in the System;
9. "Membership service" shall mean service as a member of the
classified or nonclassified optional personnel as defined in
paragraphs 3 and 4 of this section;
10. "Creditable service" shall mean membership service plus any
other service authorized under this title;
11. "Annuitant" shall mean any person in receipt of an annuity
as defined in paragraph 15 of this section;

Req. No. 16491 Page 22

RBH No. 16491
12. "Accumulated contributions" shall mean the sum of all
amounts deducted from the compensation of a member and credited to
the member's individual account in the Teachers' Savings Fund,
together with applicable interest as of June 30, 1968;
13. "Earnable compensation" shall mean the full rate of the
compensation that would be payable to a member who worked the full
normal working time;
14. "Average salary":
a. for those members who joined the System prior to July
1, 1992, shall mean the average of the salaries for
the three (3) years on which the highest contributions
to the Teachers' Retirement System of Oklahoma were
paid not to exceed the maximum contribution level
specified in Section 17-116.2 of this title or the
maximum compensation level specified in paragraph 25
of this section. Provided, no member shall retire
with an average salary in excess of Twenty-five
Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) unless the member has
made the required election and paid the required
contributions on such salary in excess of Twenty-five
Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00), or unless an eligible
member fulfills the requirements of Section 17-116.2C
of this title in order to have pre-cap removal service
included in the retirement benefit computation of the
Req. No. 16491 Page 23

RBH No. 16491
member using the regular annual compensation of the
member for any pre-cap removal year of service so
included subject to the maximum average salary amount,
and
b. for those members who join the System after June 30,
1992, shall mean the average of the salaries for five
(5) consecutive years on which the highest
contributions to the Teachers' Retirement System of
Oklahoma were paid. Only salary on which required
contributions have been made may be used in computing
average salary,
c. for participating members of the System on or after
the effective date of this act, means the first Ninety
Thousand Dollars ($90,000.00) of the regular annual
compensation of the member or the regular annual
compensation of the member on the effective date of
this act, whichever is greater, and
d. for members who join the System on or after the
effective date of this act, means the first Ninety
Thousand Dollars ($90,000.00) of the regular annual
compensation of the member;
15. "Annuity" shall mean a lifetime benefit payable in fixed
monthly installments;

Req. No. 16491 Page 24

RBH No. 16491
16. "Retirement allowance" is one-twelfth (1/12) of the annual
retirement benefit which shall be payable monthly;
17. "Retirement Benefit Fund" shall mean the fund from which
all retirement benefits shall be paid based on such mortality tables
as shall be adopted by the Board of Trustees;
18. "Actuary" shall mean a person or firm especially skilled
through training and experience in financial calculation respecting
the expectancy and duration of life;
19. "Actuarial equivalent" shall mean a benefit of equal value
when computed upon the basis of such mortality and other tables as
shall be adopted by the Board of Trustees;
20. The masculine pronoun, whenever used, shall include the
feminine;
21. "Actuarially determined cost" shall mean the single sum
which is actuarially equivalent in value to a specified annuity
amount as determined on the basis of mortality and interest
assumptions adopted by the Board of Trustees;
22. "Normal retirement age" means the earliest date upon which:
a. a member reaches the age sixty-two (62) with respect
to a member whose first creditable service occurs
prior to November 1, 2011, unless the member reaches a
normal retirement date pursuant to subparagraph c or
subparagraph d of this paragraph,

Req. No. 16491 Page 25

RBH No. 16491
b. a member reaches the age of sixty-five (65) with
respect to a member whose first creditable service
occurs on or after November 1, 2011, or with respect
to a member whose first creditable service occurs on
or after November 1, 2011, reaches a normal retirement
date pursuant to subparagraph d of this paragraph
having attained a minimum age of sixty (60) years,
c. the age at which the sum of a member's age and number
of years of creditable service total eighty (80), with
respect to a member whose first creditable service
occurred prior to July 1, 1992, and who does not reach
a normal retirement age pursuant to subparagraph a of
this paragraph, or
d. the age at which the sum of a member's age and number
of years of creditable service total ninety (90), with
respect to a member whose first creditable service
occurred on or after July 1, 1992, but prior to
November 1, 2011, if the member does not reach a
normal retirement age pursuant to subparagraph a of
this paragraph;
23. "Regular annual compensation" means salary plus fringe
benefits, excluding the flexible benefit allowance pursuant to
Section 26-105 of this title. For purposes of this definition,
regular annual compensation shall include:
Req. No. 16491 Page 26

RBH No. 16491
a. salary which accrues on a regular basis in proportion
to the service performed including payments for staff
development,
b. amounts that would otherwise qualify as salary under
subparagraph a of this paragraph but are not received
directly by the member pursuant to a good-faith,
voluntary written salary reduction agreement in order
to finance payments to a deferred compensation or tax-
sheltered annuity program or to finance benefit
options under a cafeteria plan qualifying under the
United States Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C.,
Section 101 et seq.,
c. group health and disability insurance, group term life
insurance, annuities, and pension plans, provided on a
periodic basis to all qualified employees of the
employer, which qualify as fringe benefits under the
United States Internal Revenue Code, and
d. excluded from regular annual compensation are:
(1) expense reimbursement payments,
(2) office, vehicle, housing, or other maintenance
allowances,
(3) the flexible benefit allowance provided pursuant
to Section 26-105 of this title,
(4) payment for unused vacation and sick leave,
Req. No. 16491 Page 27

RBH No. 16491
(5) any payment made for reason of termination or
retirement not specifically provided for in
divisions (1) through (3) of this subparagraph,
(6) maintenance or other nonmonetary compensation,
(7) payment received as an independent contractor or
consultant, pursuant to a lawful contract which
complies with the requirements of subsection B of
Section 6-101.2 of this title,
(8) any benefit payments not made pursuant to a valid
employment agreement,
(9) compensation for clinical related activity
performed in the University of Oklahoma Health
Sciences Center (OUHSC) Professional Practice
Plan or Oklahoma State University Center for
Health Sciences (OSU-CHS) Professional Practice
Plan, and
(10) any other compensation not described in
subparagraphs a through c of this paragraph;
24. "Active classroom teacher" means a person employed by a
school district to teach students specifically identified classes
for specifically identified subjects during the course of a
semester, and who holds a valid certificate or license issued by and
in accordance with the rules and regulations of the State Board of
Education;
Req. No. 16491 Page 28

RBH No. 16491
25. "Maximum compensation level" shall, except as otherwise
authorized pursuant to the provisions of Section 17-116.2C of this
title, mean:
a. Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) for
creditable service authorized and performed prior to
July 1, 1995, for members not electing a higher
maximum compensation level,
b. Forty Thousand Dollars ($40,000.00) for creditable
service authorized and performed prior to July 1,
1995, for members electing a maximum compensation
level in excess of Twenty-five Thousand Dollars
($25,000.00),
c. Twenty-seven Thousand Five Hundred Dollars
($27,500.00) for members who, as of June 30, 1995, had
elected to have a maximum compensation level not in
excess of Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00),
and who were employed by an entity or institution
within The Oklahoma State System of Higher Education
for creditable service authorized and performed on or
after July 1, 1995, but not later than June 30, 1996,
if such member does not elect a higher maximum
compensation level for this period as authorized by
Section 17-116.2A of this title,

Req. No. 16491 Page 29

RBH No. 16491
d. Thirty-two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($32,500.00)
for members employed by a comprehensive university if
the member meets the requirements imposed by Section
17-116.2A of this title and the member elects to
impose a higher maximum compensation level for service
performed on or after July 1, 1995, but not later than
June 30, 1996,
e. Forty-four Thousand Dollars ($44,000.00) for members
who, as of June 30, 1995, had elected to have a
maximum compensation level in excess of Twenty-five
Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00), and who were employed
by an entity or institution within The Oklahoma State
System of Higher Education for creditable service
authorized and performed on or after July 1, 1995, but
not later than June 30, 1996, if such member does not
elect a higher maximum compensation level for this
period as authorized by Section 17-116.2A of this
title,
f. Forty-nine Thousand Dollars ($49,000.00) for members
employed by a comprehensive university if the member
meets the requirements imposed by Section 17-116.2A of
this title and the member elects to impose a higher
maximum compensation level for service performed on or
after July 1, 1995, but not later than June 30, 1996,
Req. No. 16491 Page 30

RBH No. 16491
g. the following amounts for creditable service
authorized and performed by members employed by a
comprehensive university, based upon the election of
the member in effect as of June 30, 1995:
(1) for members who elected a maximum compensation
level not in excess of Twenty-five Thousand
Dollars ($25,000.00):
(a) Thirty-two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars
($32,500.00) for service authorized and
performed on or after July 1, 1996, but not
later than June 30, 1997,
(b) Thirty-seven Thousand Five Hundred Dollars
($37,500.00) for service authorized and
performed on or after July 1, 1997, but not
later than June 30, 1998,
(c) Forty-two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars
($42,500.00) for service authorized and
performed on or after July 1, 1998, but not
later than June 30, 2000,
(d) Forty-seven Thousand Five Hundred Dollars
($47,500.00) for service authorized and
performed on or after July 1, 2000, but not
later than June 30, 2001,

Req. No. 16491 Page 31

RBH No. 16491
(e) Fifty-two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars
($52,500.00) for service authorized and
performed on or after July 1, 2001, but not
later than June 30, 2002,
(f) Fifty-seven Thousand Five Hundred Dollars
($57,500.00) for service authorized and
performed on or after July 1, 2002, but not
later than June 30, 2003,
(g) Sixty-two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars
($62,500.00) for service authorized and
performed on or after July 1, 2003, but not
later than June 30, 2004,
(h) Sixty-seven Thousand Five Hundred Dollars
($67,500.00) for service authorized and
performed on or after July 1, 2004, but not
later than June 30, 2005,
(i) Seventy-two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars
($72,500.00) for service authorized and
performed on or after July 1, 2005, but not
later than June 30, 2006,
(j) Seventy-seven Thousand Five Hundred Dollars
($77,500.00) for service authorized and
performed on or after July 1, 2006, but not
later than June 30, 2007, and
Req. No. 16491 Page 32

RBH No. 16491
(k) the full amount of regular annual
compensation Ninety Thousand Dollars
($90,000.00) for service authorized and
performed on or after July 1, 2007 the
effective date of this act, and
(2) for members who elected a maximum compensation
level in excess of Twenty-five Thousand Dollars
($25,000.00):
(a) Forty-nine Thousand Dollars ($49,000.00) for
service authorized and performed on or after
July 1, 1996, but not later than June 30,
1997,
(b) Fifty-four Thousand Dollars ($54,000.00) for
service authorized and performed on or after
July 1, 1997, but not later than June 30,
1998,
(c) Fifty-nine Thousand Dollars ($59,000.00) for
service authorized and performed on or after
July 1, 1998, but not later than June 30,
2000,
(d) Sixty-four Thousand Dollars ($64,000.00) for
service authorized and performed on or after
July 1, 2000, but not later than June 30,
2001,
Req. No. 16491 Page 33

RBH No. 16491
(e) Sixty-nine Thousand Dollars ($69,000.00) for
service authorized and performed on or after
July 1, 2001, but not later than June 30,
2002,
(f) Seventy-four Thousand Dollars ($74,000.00)
for service authorized and performed on or
after July 1, 2002, but not later than June
30, 2003,
(g) Seventy-nine Thousand Dollars ($79,000.00)
for service authorized and performed on or
after July 1, 2003, but not later than June
30, 2004,
(h) Eighty-four Thousand Dollars ($84,000.00)
for service authorized and performed on or
after July 1, 2004, but not later than June
30, 2005,
(i) Eighty-nine Thousand Dollars ($89,000.00)
for service authorized and performed on or
after July 1, 2005, but not later than June
30, 2006,
(j) Ninety-four Thousand Dollars ($94,000.00)
for service authorized and performed on or
after July 1, 2006, but not later than June
30, 2007, and
Req. No. 16491 Page 34

RBH No. 16491
(k) the full amount of regular annual
compensation Ninety Thousand Dollars
($90,000.00) for service authorized and
performed on or after July 1, 2007 the
effective date of this act, and
h. the full amount of regular annual compensation of:
(1) a member of the retirement system not employed by
an entity or institution within The Oklahoma
State System of Higher Education for all
creditable service authorized and performed on or
after July 1, 1995,
(2) a member of the retirement system first employed
on or after July 1, 1995, by an entity or
institution within The Oklahoma State System of
Higher Education for all creditable service
authorized and performed on or after July 1,
1995, but not later than June 30, 1996,
(3) a member of the retirement system employed by an
entity or institution within The Oklahoma State
System of Higher Education, other than a
comprehensive university, if the member elects to
impose a higher maximum compensation level for
service performed on or after July 1, 1995, but

Req. No. 16491 Page 35

RBH No. 16491
not later than June 30, 1996, pursuant to
subsection B of Section 17-116.2A of this title,
(4) a member of the retirement system who is first
employed on or after July 1, 1996, by any entity
or institution within The Oklahoma State System
of Higher Education including a comprehensive
university, for creditable service authorized and
performed on or after July 1, 1996,
(5) a member of the retirement system who, as of July
1, 1996, is subject to a maximum compensation
level pursuant to subparagraph g of this
paragraph if the member terminates service with a
comprehensive university and is subsequently
reemployed by a comprehensive university,
(6) a member of the retirement system employed by a
comprehensive university for all service
performed on and after July 1, 2007, or
(7) an eligible member of the retirement system who
fulfills the requirements of Section 17-116.2C of
this title with respect to pre-cap removal
service included in the retirement benefit
computation of the member at the average salary
of the member subject to the maximum average
salary amount; and
Req. No. 16491 Page 36

RBH No. 16491
26. "Comprehensive university" shall mean:
a. the University of Oklahoma and all of its constituent
agencies including the University of Oklahoma Health
Sciences Center, the University of Oklahoma Law
Center, and the Oklahoma Geological Survey, and
b. Oklahoma State University and all of its constituent
agencies including the Oklahoma State University
Agricultural Experiment Station, the Oklahoma State
University Agricultural Extension Division, the
Oklahoma State University College of Veterinary
Medicine, the Oklahoma State University Center for
Health Sciences, the Technical Branch at OSU-Oklahoma
City, the Oklahoma State University Institute of
Technology-Okmulgee, and Oklahoma State University-
Tulsa.
SECTION 12. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 17-108.1,
is amended to read as follows:
Section 17-108.1. A. 1. Except as provided in paragraph 2 of
this subsection, the employer of any member of the Teachers'
Retirement System of Oklahoma shall make the following contributions
to the System:
a. beginning July 1, 1998, through June 30, 1999, eleven
and one-half percent (11 1/2%) of the regular annual

Req. No. 16491 Page 37

RBH No. 16491
compensation of the member not in excess of any
applicable maximum compensation level of the member,
b. beginning July 1, 1999, through June 30, 2000, four
and eight-tenths percent (4.8%) of the regular annual
compensation of the member not in excess of any
applicable maximum compensation level of the member,
c. beginning July 1, 2000, through June 30, 2001, five
and eight-tenths percent (5.8%) of the regular annual
compensation of the member not in excess of any
applicable maximum compensation level of the member,
d. beginning July 1, 2001, through June 30, 2002, six and
eight-tenths percent (6.8%) of the regular annual
compensation of the member not in excess of any
applicable maximum compensation level of the member,
e. beginning July 1, 2002, through December 31, 2006,
seven and five-hundredths percent (7.05%) of the
regular annual compensation of the member not in
excess of any applicable maximum compensation level of
the member,
f. beginning January 1, 2007, through June 30, 2007,
seven and six-tenths percent (7.6%) of the regular
annual compensation of the member not in excess of any
applicable maximum compensation level of the member,

Req. No. 16491 Page 38

RBH No. 16491
g. beginning July 1, 2007, through December 31, 2007,
seven and eighty-five hundredths percent (7.85%) of
the regular annual compensation of the member not in
excess of any applicable maximum compensation level of
the member,
h. beginning January 1, 2008, through June 30, 2008,
eight and thirty-five hundredths percent (8.35%) of
the regular annual compensation of the member not in
excess of any applicable maximum compensation level of
the member,
i. beginning July 1, 2008, through December 31, 2008,
eight and five-tenths percent (8.5%) of the regular
annual compensation of the member not in excess of any
applicable maximum compensation level of the member,
j. beginning January 1, 2009, through December 31, 2009,
nine percent (9%) of the regular annual compensation
of the member not in excess of any applicable maximum
compensation level of the member,
k. beginning January 1, 2010, through June 30, 2010, nine
and five-tenths percent (9.5%) of the regular annual
compensation of the member not in excess of any
applicable maximum compensation level of the member,
and

Req. No. 16491 Page 39

RBH No. 16491
l. beginning July 1, 2010, through June 30, 2011, and for
each fiscal year thereafter on the effective date of
this act, nine and five-tenths percent (9.5%) for the
first Ninety Thousand Dollars ($90,000.00) of the
regular annual compensation of the member not in
excess of any applicable maximum compensation level of
the member or, for a member who is a participating
member of the System on the effective date of this
act, nine and five-tenths percent (9.5%) of the
regular annual compensation of the member on the
effective date of this act, whichever is greater, not
in excess of any applicable maximum compensation level
of the member.
The employer contribution rate increase that would otherwise be
effective, as provided by subparagraphs f, g, h, i, j, k and l of
this paragraph, shall not become effective as law unless funding
levels to each of the affected participating employers within the
System are increased so that the additional employer contribution
obligation is funded through an appropriation or transfer of monies
instead of requiring the additional employer contribution to be paid
for from existing budgetary resources of such participating
employers. The participating employers shall use any monies
specifically made available for purposes of making employer

Req. No. 16491 Page 40

RBH No. 16491
cont ributions for such purpose and to the extent of the funds made
available for that purpose.
2. a. Beginning January 1, 2007, through December 31, 2007,
a participating employer that employs an employee of a
comprehensive university or a regional institution
offering a four-year degree program as designated or
authorized by the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher
Education shall make contributions to the System with
respect to such employees at the rate of seven and
five-hundredths percent (7.05%) of the regular annual
compensation of the member not in excess of any
applicable maximum compensation level.
b. Beginning January 1, 2008, through December 31, 2008,
a participating employer that employs an employee of a
comprehensive university or a regional institution
offering a four-year degree program as designated or
authorized by the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher
Education shall make contributions to the System with
respect to such employees at the rate of seven and
fifty-five hundredths percent (7.55%) of the regular
annual compensation of the member not in excess of any
applicable maximum compensation level of the member.
c. Beginning January 1, 2009, through December 31, 2009,
a participating employer that employs an employee of a
Req. No. 16491 Page 41

RBH No. 16491
comprehensive university or a regional institution
offering a four-year degree program as designated or
authorized by the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher
Education shall make contributions to the System with
respect to such employees at the rate of eight and
five hundredths percent (8.05%) of the regular annual
compensation of the member not in excess of any
applicable maximum compensation level of the member.
d. Beginning January 1, 2010, through June 30, 2010, a
participating employer that employs an employee of a
comprehensive university or a regional institution
offering a four-year degree program as designated or
authorized by the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher
Education shall make contributions to the System with
respect to such employees at the rate of eight and
fifty-five hundredths percent (8.55%) of the regular
annual compensation of the member not in excess of any
applicable maximum compensation level of the member.
e. Beginning July 1, 2010, through June 30, 2011, and for
each fiscal year thereafter, a participating employer
that employs an employee of a comprehensive university
or a regional institution offering a four-year degree
program as designated or authorized by the Oklahoma
State Regents for Higher Education shall make
Req. No. 16491 Page 42

RBH No. 16491
contributions to the System with respect to such
employees at the rate of eight and fifty-five
hundredths percent (8.55%) of the regular annual
compensation of the member not in excess of any
applicable maximum compensation level of the member.
The employer contribution rate increase that would otherwise be
effective as provided by subparagraphs b, c, d and e of this
paragraph shall not become effective as law unless funding levels
are increased so that the additional employer contribution
obligation is funded through such an appropriation or transfer of
monies instead of requiring the additional employer contribution to
be paid for from existing budgetary resources of such participating
employers. The participating employers shall use any monies
specifically made available for purposes of making employer
contributions for such purpose and to the extent of the funds made
available for that purpose.
3. Any employer contribution paid to the System pursuant to
this subsection shall not be considered as salary, fringe benefit,
or total compensation due to members for the purpose of meeting any
legislative or contractual obligation of the employer.
B. For entities or institutions within The Oklahoma State
System of Higher Education, the contributions to the System shall be
made on regular annual compensation of a member who is an employee

Req. No. 16491 Page 43

RBH No. 16491
of s uch entity or institution not to exceed the maximum compensation
level in effect for the member as prescribed by law.
C. Employers paying contributions to the System pursuant to
subsection A or B of this section shall receive credit for that
portion of the gross production tax on natural gas and/or casinghead
gas apportioned to the System pursuant to subsection 2 of Section
1004 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes in meeting the total
required employer contribution. On an annual basis, the Board of
Trustees of the Teachers' Retirement System of Oklahoma shall
estimate the net additional cost required to be paid by the
contributing employers in order to meet the total employer
contribution as provided in subsection A or B of this section. The
Board of Trustees shall approve the amount of the additional
contribution required to be paid by contributing employers as a
percentage of total member salaries and fringe benefits for each
fiscal year ending June 30, no later than April 1 of the previous
fiscal year. In no event shall the additional contribution required
to be paid by the contributing employer under this subsection be
less than the contribution required under this subsection in the
prior year. In the event actual contributions do not equal the
required total contribution as provided in subsection A or B of this
section, the net difference between the actual contributions and the
required total contributions shall be determined and shall be
included in the amount of the additional contribution required to be
Req. No. 16491 Page 44

RBH No. 16491
paid by contributing employers for the next fiscal year. All
contributing employers shall pay the same percentage of total member
salaries and fringe benefits during each fiscal year. The
provisions of this subsection shall terminate June 30, 1999.
D. Any school district, state college or university, State
Board of Education, State Board of Career and Technology Education,
or other state agency may, for and on behalf of any member of the
System, pay all or any portion of the contribution required by
Section 17-108 of this title. Provided, the contribution so paid by
any school district, state college or university, State Board of
Education, State Board of Career and Technology Education, or other
state agency shall be and remain subject to the withdrawal
provisions set forth under the System. Wherever the term
"contribution" is used, it shall be deemed to include contributions
paid for and on behalf of a member by a school district, state
college or university, State Board of Education, State Board of
Career and Technology Education, or other state agency.
E. All participating employers shall provide a complete record
of the total compensation paid to each employee, including any
person who is a retired member of the System, whether or not
employer and employee contributions are made with respect to such
compensation. The employer shall provide the report required by
this subsection on a monthly basis on a form or using such method as
the Teachers' Retirement System of Oklahoma may require and shall
Req. No. 16491 Page 45

RBH No. 16491
prov ide a comprehensive annual report showing the correct
compensation, service credit and contributions for the prior fiscal
year. Each participating employer shall provide reasonable access
to its payroll records, records of contribution payments to the
System and all other records relevant to the participation of its
employees in the System, to the System, its employees or authorized
agents. A participating employer shall cooperate with auditors
retained by the System to audit its financial statements or
otherwise audit the financial operations of the System.
F. On or after the effective date of this act, any amount of
money not required for purposes of the employer contribution
otherwise provided by this section shall be transferred to the
Special Cash Fund to be used for such purposes as may be provided by
law including, but not limited to, any purpose prescribed by an
appropriation measure enacted during any regular or extraordinary
session of the Legislature.
SECTION 13. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 17-116.2,
is amended to read as follows:
Section 17-116.2. A. 1. Beginning July 1, 1987, and prior to
July 1, 1995, a member who retires on or after the member's normal
retirement age or whose retirement is because of disability shall
receive an annual allowance for life, payable monthly, in an amount
equal to two percent (2%) of the member's highest three-year average

Req. No. 16491 Page 46

RBH No. 16491
sala ry upon which member contributions were made, multiplied by the
number of the member's years of creditable service.
A classified member who retired prior to July 1, 1986, shall
have the member's retirement allowance calculated on a minimum
average salary of Eleven Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($11,500.00)
or on the member's current minimum average salary plus Two Thousand
Dollars ($2,000.00), whichever is greater. Beginning July 1, 1994,
a classified member who retired prior to July 1, 1993, shall have
the member's retirement allowance calculated on the member's current
minimum average salary plus Five Hundred Fifty Dollars ($550.00).
An unclassified member who retired prior to July 1, 1986, shall have
the member's retirement allowance calculated on a minimum average
salary of Nine Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($9,500.00) or on the
member's current minimum average salary plus One Thousand Dollars
($1,000.00), whichever is greater. Beginning July 1, 1994, an
unclassified member who retired prior to July 1, 1993, shall have
the member's retirement allowance calculated on the member's current
minimum average salary plus Two Hundred Seventy-five Dollars
($275.00). Those individuals receiving benefits pursuant to
subsection (3) of Section 17-105 of this title whose benefits
commenced prior to July 1, 1993, shall receive an increase in
benefits of two and one-half percent (2 1/2%). No retirement
benefit payments shall be made retroactively.

Req. No. 16491 Page 47

RBH No. 16491
For those members retiring before normal retirement age, except
for those members retiring because of a disability, the retirement
allowance shall be subject to adjustment in accordance with the
actuarial equivalent factors adopted by the Board of Trustees.
2. Beginning July 1, 1995, a member, who has no service
performed on or after July 1, 1995, for an entity or institution
within The Oklahoma State System of Higher Education, who retires on
or after the member's normal retirement age or whose retirement is
because of disability shall receive an annual allowance for life,
payable monthly as follows:
a. if the member becomes a member after June 30, 1995,
and was not eligible to become a member prior to July
1, 1995, in an amount equal to two percent (2%) of the
member's average salary upon which member
contributions were made, multiplied by the number of
the member's years of creditable service, or
b. if the member became a member or is eligible to become
a member prior to July 1, 1995, and elected to have a
maximum compensation level in excess of Twenty-five
Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) pursuant to paragraph 1
of subsection C of this section or pursuant to
subsection E of this section, or if the member's
salary has never exceeded Twenty-five Thousand Dollars

Req. No. 16491 Page 48

RBH No. 16491
($25,000.00) prior to July 1, 1995, in an amount equal
to:
(1) two percent (2%) of the member's average salary
upon which member contributions were made not to
exceed Forty Thousand Dollars ($40,000.00),
multiplied by the number of the member's years of
credited service authorized and performed prior
to July 1, 1995, plus any years of prior service
authorized under this title, plus
(2) two percent (2%) of the member's average salary
upon which member contributions were made,
multiplied by the number of the member's years of
credited service authorized and performed after
June 30, 1995, or
c. if the member became a member or is eligible to become
a member prior to July 1, 1995, and was eligible to
elect to have a maximum compensation level in excess
of Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) and did
not elect or elected not to have a maximum
compensation level of Forty Thousand Dollars
($40,000.00) pursuant to paragraph 1 of subsection C
of this section or pursuant to subsection E of this
section, in an amount equal to:

Req. No. 16491 Page 49

RBH No. 16491
(1) two percent (2%) of the member's average salary
upon which member contributions were made not to
exceed Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00),
multiplied by the number of the member's years of
credited service authorized and performed prior
to July 1, 1995, plus any years of prior service
authorized under this title, plus
(2) two percent (2%) of the member's average salary
upon which member contributions were made,
multiplied by the number of the member's years of
credited service authorized and performed after
June 30, 1995.
B. Except as otherwise provided for in this section, the amount
contributed by each member to the retirement system shall be:
1. Beginning July 1, 1992, through June 30, 1996, six percent
(6%) of the regular annual compensation of such member not in excess
of Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) and beginning July 1,
1995, through June 30, 1996, six percent (6%) of the maximum
compensation level;
2. Beginning July 1, 1996, through June 30, 1997, six and one-
half percent (6 1/2%) of the regular annual compensation of members,
who are not employed by an entity or institution within The Oklahoma
State System of Higher Education not in excess of Twenty-five
Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) and beginning July 1, 1996, through
Req. No. 16491 Page 50

RBH No. 16491
June 30, 1997, six and one-half percent (6 1/2%) of the regular
annual compensation of members, who are employed by an entity or
institution within The Oklahoma State System of Higher Education,
not in excess of Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00);
3. Beginning July 1, 1997 on the effective date of this act,
seven percent (7%) for the first Ninety Thousand Dollars
($90,000.00) of the regular annual compensation of the member not in
excess of any applicable maximum compensation level of the member
or, for a member who is a participating member of the System on the
effective date of this act, seven percent (7%) of the regular annual
compensation of the member on the effective date of this act,
whichever is greater, not in excess of any applicable maximum
compensation level of the member; and
4. All public schools in this state shall treat the employee
contributions as being picked up under the provisions of Section 414
(h)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 in determining tax
treatment.
Subject to Internal Revenue Service approval, paragraph 4 of this
subsection shall not apply to a comprehensive university group
established on or before July 1, 1998, whose employee contributions
were consistently treated as not picked up as of July 1, 1998, and
at all times thereafter.
C. 1. Prior to July 1, 1995, an active member of the System
may elect to have a maximum compensation level of Forty Thousand
Req. No. 16491 Page 51

RBH No. 16491
Doll ars ($40,000.00). Such an election shall be made in writing and
filed with the System. Members whose salaries are in excess of
Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) on July 20, 1987, shall
file the election with the System prior to January 1, 1988. Members
whose salaries exceed Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00)
after July 20, 1987, shall file the election when the salary exceeds
Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00). If a member makes such
an election, the member shall contribute the following amounts:
a. beginning July 1, 1992, through June 30, 1993, eleven
percent (11%) of the regular annual compensation of
such member that is in excess of Twenty-five Thousand
Dollars ($25,000.00) and is not in excess of Forty
Thousand Dollars ($40,000.00),
b. beginning July 1, 1993, through June 30, 1994, nine
percent (9%) of the regular annual compensation of
such member that is in excess of Twenty-five Thousand
Dollars ($25,000.00) and is not in excess of Forty
Thousand Dollars ($40,000.00), and
c. beginning July 1, 1994, through June 30, 1995, eight
percent (8%) of the regular annual compensation of
such member that is in excess of Twenty-five Thousand
Dollars ($25,000.00) and is not in excess of Forty
Thousand Dollars ($40,000.00). Except as provided in

Req. No. 16491 Page 52

RBH No. 16491
subsection E of this section, any such election shall
be irrevocable.
2. After June 30, 1995, in addition to the amount contributed
by each member to the retirement system pursuant to subsection B of
this section, the total amount contributed by each member to the
retirement system shall include, beginning July 1, 1995, through
June 30, 1997, seven percent (7%) of the regular annual compensation
of each member, who is not employed by an entity or institution
within The Oklahoma State System of Higher Education, that is in
excess of Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) and beginning
July 1, 1996, through June 30, 1997, seven percent (7%) of the
regular annual compensation of each member who is employed by an
entity or institution within The Oklahoma State System of Higher
Education in excess of Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00),
but not in excess of any applicable maximum compensation level of
the member.
D. 1. Any member who was a contributing member of the
Retirement System between July 1, 1987, and June 30, 1995, who at
the time the member was eligible to make an election to increase the
maximum compensation level of the member, failed to make an election
or chose not to increase the maximum compensation level of the
member to Forty Thousand Dollars ($40,000.00), may elect to make
back contributions to the Retirement System. The member shall
complete a new election form and file with the Board of Trustees,
Req. No. 16491 Page 53

RBH No. 16491
the form and a payment equaling the difference between the amount
contributed at the twenty-five-thousand-dollar level and the
appropriate contribution on compensation in excess of Twenty-five
Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) up to a maximum of Forty Thousand
Dollars ($40,000.00) shall be made prior to the official retirement
date of the member. The required payment shall include any
contribution required by the employing school district, and shall
include interest compounded annually at ten percent (10%) per annum
of both employer and employee contributions.
2. Any changes made pursuant to this subsection shall be
irrevocable.
E. 1. An individual who withdrew from the Teachers' Retirement
System and whose salary was in excess of Seven Thousand Eight
Hundred Dollars ($7,800.00) and had elected to contribute only on
Seven Thousand Eight Hundred Dollars ($7,800.00) before his or her
withdrawal shall contribute on the earning ceiling as provided for
in this section on his or her reentry into membership in the
Teachers' Retirement System.
2. An individual who elected to contribute on a maximum of
Seven Thousand Eight Hundred Dollars ($7,800.00) per annum shall,
beginning July 1, 1979, contribute on his or her earning ceiling as
provided for in this section.
3. Any member who elected to contribute on Seven Thousand Eight
Hundred Dollars ($7,800.00) prior to January 1, 1978, and whose
Req. No. 16491 Page 54

RBH No. 16491
sala ry was more than Seven Thousand Eight Hundred Dollars
($7,800.00) during the school years 1974-75 through 1978-79 may
elect to make back contributions to the retirement system by paying
the five percent (5%) contributions on the difference between Seven
Thousand Eight Hundred Dollars ($7,800.00) and the actual salary of
the member, not to exceed Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) for each
applicable school year, plus interest compounded annually at ten
percent (10%) per annum. Such payment shall be made prior to the
official retirement date of the member.
F. Each employer shall cause to be deducted from the salary of
each member on each and every payroll of such employer for each and
every payroll period, the proper percentage of his or her earnable
compensation as provided for in subsection B or subsection C of this
section.
1. Deductions shall begin with the first payroll period of the
school year. In determining the amount earnable by a member in a
payroll period, the Board of Trustees shall consider the rate of
annual compensation payable to such member on the first day of the
payroll period as continuing throughout such payroll period, and it
may omit deductions from compensation for any period less than a
full period, and to facilitate the making of deductions, it may
modify the deduction required of any member by such an amount as
shall not exceed one-tenth of one percent (1/10 of 1%) of the annual
compensation upon the basis of which such deduction is to be made.
Req. No. 16491 Page 55

RBH No. 16491
Prio r to January 1, 1991, any active contributing member who joined
the System subsequent to July 1, 1943, may pay the normal cost,
which shall mean the single sum which would have been paid under
existing statutes at the time the service was performed, plus
interest, for years of teaching service in Oklahoma from the date of
establishment of the System in 1943 to date of membership, in a lump
sum, or in installments equal to establishing one (1) year of
creditable service. Effective January 1, 1991, any active
contributing member who joined the System subsequent to July 1,
1943, may pay the amount determined by the Board of Trustees
pursuant to Section 17-116.8 of this title for years of teaching
service in Oklahoma from the date of establishment of the System in
1943 to date of membership, in a lump sum, or in installments equal
to establishing one (1) year of creditable service. For purposes of
this option, teaching service in Oklahoma shall include the teaching
of vocational agricultural courses within Oklahoma for the federal
government. Years for which contributions are paid shall count as
membership service under this plan. A member may receive credit for
not more than five (5) years of teaching service rendered while in
the Peace Corps or in the public schools of a territory of the
United States or the public schools, American Military Dependent
Schools or state colleges or state universities outside this state
by paying his or her contributions, plus interest, and membership
fees to the retirement system, subject to the regulations of the
Req. No. 16491 Page 56

RBH No. 16491
Boar d of Trustees, providing he or she is not receiving and is not
eligible to receive retirement credit or benefits from said service
in any other public retirement system of this state, or any other
state or territory of the United States subject to the following
provisions:
a. the member is required to have two (2) years of
employed service teaching earned in Oklahoma for each
year of Peace Corps, territorial, out-of-state,
noncovered in-state or military membership credit
granted.
b. prior to January 1, 1991, the out-of-state or
noncovered in-state payment shall be the normal cost,
which means the single sum which would have been paid
under existing law at the time the service was
performed, plus interest, on the basis of what his or
her annual salary would have been in Oklahoma or out
of state, whichever is greater, had he or she been
employed as a teacher. Effective January 1, 1991, the
Peace Corps, territorial, out-of-state or noncovered
in-state payment shall be the amount determined by the
Board of Trustees pursuant to Section 17-116.8 of this
title.
2. In addition to the deductions hereinabove provided for, any
member who becomes a member of the Armed Forces of the United States
Req. No. 16491 Page 57

RBH No. 16491
of A merica during any period of national emergency, including World
War II, the Korean conflict, the Vietnam conflict or others as may
be determined by the Board of Trustees, or whose entrance into or
training for the teaching profession was interrupted by his or her
entrance into the Armed Forces, and who was or shall have become a
member of the Teachers' Retirement System shall be granted the
privilege of making up his or her five percent (5%) contributions as
provided for in this section until January 1, 1991, for not to
exceed five (5) years of service in the Armed Forces by electing to
pay said contributions on the basis of the rate of pay in his or her
contract as a teacher at the time his or her service in the Armed
Forces commenced or in the case of a teacher who was not teaching
prior to entering the Armed Forces, on the basis of the salary of
the first year of teaching after being honorably discharged from the
Armed Forces. Effective January 1, 1991, the member will receive
such service upon payment of the amount determined by the Board of
Trustees pursuant to Section 17-116.8 of this title. Such
contributions shall be credited in the regular manner, and the
period for which said contributions were paid shall be counted as
creditable years of service and allocated to the period during which
the military service was rendered, except that the period for which
contributions were paid must have been continuous and shall be
credited in the aggregate, regardless of fiscal year limitations.
Notwithstanding any provision herein to the contrary, contributions,
Req. No. 16491 Page 58

RBH No. 16491
bene fits and service credit with respect to qualified military
service as defined by Section 414(u) of the Internal Revenue Code of
1986 shall be provided in accordance with Section 414(u) of the
Internal Revenue Code.
3. Retirement benefits for all service credits purchased
pursuant to this subsection shall be determined in accordance with
the provisions of paragraph 2 of this subsection.
G. Effective July 1, 2004, the total creditable service of a
member who retires or terminates employment and elects a vested
benefit shall include not to exceed one hundred twenty (120) days of
unused sick leave accumulated subsequent to August 1, 1959. Twenty
(20) days of unused sick leave shall equal one (1) month for
purposes of creditable service credit. If the member becomes a
member or was eligible to become a member prior to July 1, 1995, the
year of credit received in this section shall be treated as service
earned prior to July 1, 1995. This subsection shall apply to
members retiring or vesting on or after the effective date of this
act and shall not be retroactive.
H. Any member who:
1. Shall be absent from the teaching service because of
election to the State Legislature or appointment to the executive
branch in an education-related capacity shall be allowed thirty (30)
days from the date as of which the person is officially elected or
appointed to file an election with the Teachers' Retirement System
Req. No. 16491 Page 59

RBH No. 16491
to r etain his or her membership in the Teachers' Retirement System
upon payment of the contribution required of other members and
employers of said members as provided for in this section and his or
her service credits shall continue to be accumulated during such
absence, provided he or she is not receiving retirement credits or
benefits from said service beginning after July 1, 1992, in other
public retirement systems; or
2. Became an employee of the Oklahoma Commission for Teacher
Preparation on or subsequent to June 1, 2001, but prior to July 1,
2002, who was previously employed by a participating employer within
the Teachers' Retirement System of Oklahoma, may elect to cancel any
accumulated service credit accrued within the Oklahoma Public
Employees Retirement System on or after June 1, 2001, but prior to
July 1, 2002, by filing an election with the Oklahoma Public
Employees Retirement System for the cancellation of such service
credit. The election shall be irrevocable and shall require the
Oklahoma Public Employees Retirement System to transfer all
accumulated employer and employee contributions made on behalf of or
by the person making such election to the Teachers' Retirement
System for such period of time. The Teachers' Retirement System
shall compute the employee contributions that would have been made
to the System by such employee if the contributions had been
computed pursuant to this section. In order to receive the full
amount of creditable service for the period of time on or after June
Req. No. 16491 Page 60

RBH No. 16491
1, 2 001, but not later than June 30, 2002, the employee shall be
required to pay any difference between the transferred employee
contributions and the amount computed by the Teachers' Retirement
System. The employee may make payment of any required amount in the
manner provided by and subject to the requirements of Section 17-
116.8 of this title. After payment of all required employee
contributions, the Teachers' Retirement System shall credit the
period of time represented by the transferred employee contributions
as creditable service within the meaning of Section 17-101 of this
title. After the transfer of the employee contributions, the
Oklahoma Public Employees Retirement System shall cancel any service
credit previously accumulated for the period of time represented by
such transferred employee contributions. Any person who makes the
election provided for by this paragraph, and who continues
employment with the Oklahoma Commission for Teacher Preparation on
or after July 1, 2002, shall continue to accrue service credit in
the Teachers' Retirement System of Oklahoma. The employer shall
make employer contributions according to the requirements of Section
17-108.1 of this title and shall provide for the deduction of
employee contributions as required by this section.
I. Any member who shall be absent from the teaching service
because of election or appointment as a local, state or national
education association officer, prior to January 1, 2011, shall be
allowed to retain his or her membership in the Teachers' Retirement
Req. No. 16491 Page 61

RBH No. 16491
Syst em upon payment of the contribution required of other members
and employers of said members as provided for in this section and
his or her service credits shall continue to be accumulated during
such absence. Provided, however, any one such absence shall not
exceed twelve (12) continuous years. No member who has less than
ten (10) years of contributory service on July 1, 1994, may make
this election after June 30, 1994. Members contributing to the
System on July 1, 1994, may continue to contribute under this
subsection until they have completed eight (8) years allowed by this
subsection. The member may file for retirement when otherwise
eligible for retirement as provided by Section 17-105 of this title.
J. A member may receive credit for those years of service
accumulated by the member while employed by an entity which is a
participating employer in the Oklahoma Firefighters Pension and
Retirement System, the Oklahoma Police Pension and Retirement
System, the Uniform Retirement System for Justices and Judges, the
Oklahoma Law Enforcement Retirement System, or the Oklahoma Public
Employees Retirement System, if the member is not receiving or
eligible to receive retirement credit or benefits from said service
in any other public retirement system. A member also may receive
credit for those years of service with the Department of Wildlife
Conservation or with an employer that is a participating employer
within one of the state retirement systems specifically referred to
in this section when at the time of such service by the member the
Req. No. 16491 Page 62

RBH No. 16491
empl oyer was not such a participating employer, if the member is not
receiving or eligible to receive retirement credit or benefits from
said service in any other public retirement system. To receive the
service credit provided in this subsection, the member shall pay the
amount determined by the Board of Trustees pursuant to Section 17-
116.8 of this title. For purposes of this subsection, creditable
service transferred from the Oklahoma Public Employees Retirement
System shall include service authorized under paragraph (f) of
subsection (2) of Section 913 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes
as amended from time to time. Members who retire prior to July 1,
1993, shall have their monthly benefit adjusted to include all
services accrued under paragraph (f) of subsection (2) of Section
913 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes. Provided however, any
adjustment of existing retirement benefits caused by reason of
inclusion of such service authorized under paragraph (f) of
subsection (2) of Section 913 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes
shall not affect any retirement benefit paid prior to July 1, 1993.
K. 1. An active member of the Teachers' Retirement System of
Oklahoma may receive credit for those years of service accumulated
by the member while a member of the Oklahoma Public Employees
Retirement System if:
a. the member is an active member of the Teachers'
Retirement System of Oklahoma, and

Req. No. 16491 Page 63

RBH No. 16491
b. the member provides notice to the Oklahoma Public
Employees Retirement System and the Teachers'
Retirement System of Oklahoma of the member's election
to transfer said service credit. The notice shall
include a list of the years to be transferred, and
c. the member is not receiving or eligible to receive
retirement credit or benefits from said service in any
other public retirement system, notwithstanding the
years of service sought to be transferred under this
subsection.
Members electing to take advantage of the transfer authorized by
this subsection who are receiving or eligible to receive retirement
credit or benefits from said service in any other public retirement
system shall have all service credit with the Oklahoma Public
Employees Retirement System canceled which is not transferred to the
Teachers' Retirement System of Oklahoma or used as a cash offset in
such a transfer pursuant to subparagraph d of paragraph 2 of this
subsection. Service credit transferred to the Teachers' Retirement
System of Oklahoma under this subsection shall also be canceled with
the Oklahoma Public Employees Retirement System.
2. For purposes of this subsection, the "sending system" shall
mean the Oklahoma Public Employees Retirement System. The
"receiving system" shall mean the Teachers' Retirement System of
Oklahoma.
Req. No. 16491 Page 64

RBH No. 16491
a. Within thirty (30) days notification of an intent to
transfer is received by the sending system, the
sending system shall, according to its own rules and
regulations:
(1) for members who have accrued at least eight (8)
years of credited service with the sending
system, determine the present value of the
member's earned benefits attributable to the
years of service sought to be transferred,
discounted according to the member's age at the
time of transfer and computed as of the earliest
age at which the member would be able to retire.
Said computation shall assume an unreduced
benefit and be computed using interest and
mortality assumptions consistent with the
actuarial assumptions adopted by the Board of
Trustees for purposes of preparing the annual
actuarial evaluation, but shall not make any
projections regarding future salary. For
employees who have accrued at least eight (8)
years of credited service, the sending system
shall use the product of this calculation for
purposes of determining the transfer fee to be
paid by the employee under subparagraph c of this
Req. No. 16491 Page 65

RBH No. 16491
paragraph so long as it is greater than the
product of the calculation in division (2) of
this subparagraph, and
(2) determine the sum of the employee and employer
contributions applicable to the years of service
sought to be transferred plus interest consistent
with the actuarial assumptions adopted by the
Board of Trustees for purposes of preparing the
annual actuarial evaluation. For all nonvested
members, and for members who have accrued at
least eight (8) years of credited service, if the
product of this calculation is greater than the
product of the calculation in division (1) of
this subparagraph, the sending system shall use
the product of this calculation for purposes of
determining the amount to be transferred by the
sending system under subparagraph c of this
paragraph and any transfer fee to be paid by the
member under subparagraph d of this paragraph.
b. Within thirty (30) days notification of an intent to
transfer is received by the receiving system, the
receiving system shall determine, according to the
system's own rules and regulations, the present value
of the member's incremental projected benefits
Req. No. 16491 Page 66

RBH No. 16491
discounted according to the member's age at the time
of the transfer. Incremental projected benefits shall
be the difference between the projected benefit said
member would receive without transferring the service
credit and the projected benefit after transfer of
service credit computed as of the earliest age at
which the member would be able to retire. Said
computation shall assume an unreduced benefit and be
computed using interest, salary projections and
mortality assumptions consistent with the actuarial
assumptions adopted by the Board of Trustees for
purposes of preparing the annual actuarial evaluation.
c. The sending system shall, within sixty (60) days from
the date notification of an intent to transfer is
received by the sending system, transfer to the
receiving system the amount determined in subparagraph
a of this paragraph. Except if the cost as calculated
under subparagraph a of this paragraph is greater than
the actuarial value of the incremental benefit in the
receiving system, as established in subparagraph b of
this paragraph, the sending system shall send the
receiving system an amount equal to the actuarial
value of the incremental projected benefit in the
receiving system.
Req. No. 16491 Page 67

RBH No. 16491
d. In order to receive the credit provided for in
paragraph 1 of this subsection, if the cost of the
actuarial value of the incremental benefit to the
receiving system is greater than the cost as
calculated under subparagraph a of this paragraph for
the same years of service to the sending system as
established in subparagraphs a and b of this
paragraph, the employee shall elect to:
(1) pay any difference to receive full credit for the
years sought to be transferred, or
(2) receive prorated service credit for only the
amount received from the Oklahoma Public
Employees Retirement System pursuant to this
subsection.
Such an election shall be made in writing, filed with
the System prior to receiving the credit provided for
in paragraph 1 of this subsection, and shall be
irrevocable.
3. Within sixty (60) days of successfully completing all of the
requirements for transfer under this subsection, the sending system
shall pay the receiving system any amount due under this subsection.
Within sixty (60) days of successfully completing all of the
requirements for transfer under this subsection, the member shall
pay the receiving system any amount due under this subsection. In
Req. No. 16491 Page 68

RBH No. 16491
the event that the member is unable to pay the transfer fee provided
for in this subsection by the due date, the Board of Trustees of the
receiving system shall permit the member to amortize the transfer
fee over a period not to exceed sixty (60) months. Said payments
shall be made by payroll deductions unless the Board of Trustees
permits an alternate payment source. The amortization shall include
interest in an amount not to exceed the actuarially assumed interest
rate adopted by the Board of Trustees for investment earnings each
year. Any member who ceases to make payment, terminates, retires or
dies before completing the payments provided for in this section
shall receive prorated service credit for only those payments made,
unless the unpaid balance is paid by said member, his or her estate
or successor in interest within six (6) months after said member's
death, termination of employment or retirement, provided no
retirement benefits shall be payable until the unpaid balance is
paid, unless said member or beneficiary affirmatively waives the
additional six-month period in which to pay the unpaid balance.
4. Years of service transferred pursuant to this subsection
shall be used both in determining the member's retirement benefit
and in determining the years of service for retirement and/or
vesting purposes. Years of service rendered as a member of the
Oklahoma Public Employees Retirement System prior to July 1, 1992,
if any, shall be deemed to be years of service rendered as a member
of the Teachers' Retirement System of Oklahoma prior to July 1,
Req. No. 16491 Page 69

RBH No. 16491
1992 , and shall qualify such person as a member of the Teachers'
Retirement System of Oklahoma before July 1, 1992.
5. Notwithstanding the requirements of subsection (5) of
Section 917 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes, members electing
to take advantage of the transfer authorized by this subsection who
have withdrawn their contributions from the sending system shall
remit to the sending system the amount of the accumulated
contributions the member has withdrawn plus simple interest of ten
percent (10%) per annum prior to making said election or the
election shall be deemed invalid and the transfer shall be canceled.
If such an election is deemed invalid and the transfer is canceled,
the accumulated contribution remitted to the sending system by the
member who originally withdrew their contributions shall be returned
to the member. The member's rights and obligations regarding any
service credit reestablished in the sending system due to a failure
to satisfy the requirements of this subsection shall be determined
by the sending system in accordance with Section 901 et seq. of
Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
6. If any member fails for any reason to satisfy the
requirements of this subsection, the election to transfer service
credit shall be void and of no effect, and any service credited as a
result of this transfer shall be canceled. If such service is
canceled, the years of canceled service credit which were
unsuccessfully transferred to the receiving system from the sending
Req. No. 16491 Page 70

RBH No. 16491
syst em shall be reestablished in the sending system. The member's
rights and obligations regarding any service credit reestablished in
the sending system due to a failure to satisfy the requirements of
this subsection shall be determined by the sending system in
accordance with Section 901 et seq. of Title 74 of the Oklahoma
Statutes.
7. The Board of Trustees shall promulgate such rules as are
necessary to implement the provisions of this subsection.
L. Any member whose regular annual compensation was not
determined as provided for by law may pay the member contribution
required pursuant to subsection B of this section on such amount not
included in the member's regular annual compensation and receive
credit for such amount in the calculation of the member's benefit.
The employees must pay the employer contributions required pursuant
to Section 17-108.1 of this title. Interest at the rate of ten
percent (10%) per annum shall be charged to both employee and
employer contributions. Provided that the employing district may
pay all or any portion of the contributions and interest the member
is required to pay. Any payment by the employing district for a
prior year obligation shall be considered a current obligation of
the employer.
M. Any active member who elected during the 1978-79 school year
to pay the difference between five percent (5%) on actual salary not
exceeding Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) and six percent (6%) on
Req. No. 16491 Page 71

RBH No. 16491
actu al salary not exceeding Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00)
shall receive credit for one (1) year of credited service upon
receipt and approval of a proper request by the Board of Trustees.
N. Effective July 1, 1988, any member who is employed by the
Governor, the State Senate, the House of Representatives or the
Legislative Service Bureau shall be allowed to elect to retain
membership in the Retirement System upon payment of the accrued and
current member contributions and employer contributions as provided
in subsection B of this section and Section 17-108.1 of this title.
Such contributions may be paid on behalf of the member by the
employing entity. Upon payment of such contributions, service
credits shall continue to be accumulated during such employment.
Accrued contributions shall be paid to the Retirement System by
August 1, 1989. Current contributions shall be paid to the
Retirement System by the tenth of the following month beginning with
the month of July 1989.
O. Notwithstanding any requirements of this title to restrict
the payment of service purchases, the Board of Trustees shall
promulgate such rules as necessary to allow active members of the
System to make installment payments for the redeposit of withdrawn
accounts or other payments due under the provisions of this title.
The rules shall permit the member to amortize the balance due over a
period not to exceed sixty (60) months, and shall include interest
consistent with the actuarial assumptions adopted by the Board of
Req. No. 16491 Page 72

RBH No. 16491
Trus tees for purposes of preparing the annual actuarial evaluation.
Further, the rules shall provide that all payments must be completed
prior to the effective retirement date of the member.
P. 1. A member of the Oklahoma Public Employees Retirement
System who becomes a member of the Teachers' Retirement System of
Oklahoma because the member has become employed by an entity or
institution within The Oklahoma State System of Higher Education,
State Board of Education, State Board of Career and Technology
Education, Oklahoma Department of Career and Technology Education,
Oklahoma School of Science and Mathematics, Oklahoma Center for the
Advancement of Science and Technology, State Department of
Rehabilitation Services, Oklahoma State Regents for Higher
Education, Department of Corrections, State Department of Education,
Oklahoma Board of Private Vocational Schools, Board of Regents of
Oklahoma Colleges, Oklahoma Student Loan Authority, or the Teachers'
Retirement System of Oklahoma, may elect to receive credit in the
Teachers' Retirement System of Oklahoma for those years of service
accumulated by the member in the Oklahoma Public Employees
Retirement System pursuant to this subsection. A member shall be
eligible to elect to receive credit for such years of service if:
a. the member is an active member of the Teachers'
Retirement System of Oklahoma,
b. the member provides notice to the Teachers' Retirement
System of Oklahoma and the Oklahoma Public Employees
Req. No. 16491 Page 73

RBH No. 16491
Retirement System of the member's election to transfer
such retirement credit. The notice shall include a
list of the years to be transferred, and
c. the member is not receiving or eligible to receive
retirement credit or benefits from such service in any
other public retirement system, notwithstanding the
years of service sought to be transferred under this
subsection.
Members electing to take advantage of the transfer authorized by
this subsection shall have all service credit with the Oklahoma
Public Employees Retirement System canceled which is transferred to
the Teachers' Retirement System of Oklahoma.
2. For purposes of this subsection, the "sending system" shall
mean the Oklahoma Public Employees Retirement System. The
"receiving system" shall mean the Teachers' Retirement System of
Oklahoma. Within thirty (30) days after notification of an intent
to transfer is received by the sending system, the sending system
shall, according to its own rules, send to the receiving system all
employer and employee contributions made on behalf of the member
which were made to the sending system plus an additional amount of
earnings based on the actuarial assumed rate of the sending system.
Upon receipt of these contributions by the receiving system, the
receiving system shall give credit to the transferring member in an
amount equal to the years of service accrued in the sending system.
Req. No. 16491 Page 74

RBH No. 16491
3. If the transferring member's normal retirement date
calculation is based upon the sum of the member's age and number of
years of credited service totaling eighty (80) in the sending
system, then the member shall retain such calculation in the
receiving system.
4. The Board of Trustees shall promulgate such rules as are
necessary to implement the provisions of this subsection.
Q. A former member of the Teachers' Retirement System of
Oklahoma who withdrew his or her contributions from the System prior
to January 1, 1983, and who had at least ten (10) years of service
in the System and purchased that service in the Oklahoma Public
Employees Retirement System, may elect to revoke that purchase from
the Oklahoma Public Employees Retirement System and to repay the
withdrawn contributions to the System in order to be eligible, once
such member reaches the normal retirement age, to receive a
retirement benefit that is based upon years of service and
compensation at the time such member terminated employment. In
addition, such former member may elect to transfer service credit
accrued in the Oklahoma Public Employees Retirement System to the
Teachers' Retirement System of Oklahoma pursuant to subsection K of
this section. The election, pursuant to this subsection, shall be
made prior to September 1, 2000. The election and the repayment
shall be made according to rules promulgated by the Board.

Req. No. 16491 Page 75

RBH No. 16491
SECTION 14. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 902, as
last amended by Section 1, Chapter 280, O.S.L. 2024 (74 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 902), is amended to read as follows:
Section 902. As used in Section 901 et seq. of this title:
(1) "System" means the Oklahoma Public Employees Retirement
System as established by Section 901 et seq. of this title and as it
may hereafter be amended;
(2) "Accumulated contributions" means the sum of all
contributions by a member to the System which shall be credited to
the member's account;
(3) "Act" means Sections 901 to 932, inclusive, of this title;
(4) "Actuarial equivalent" means a deferred income benefit of
equal value to the accumulated deposits or benefits when computed
upon the basis of the actuarial tables in use by the System;
(5) "Actuarial tables" means the actuarial tables approved and
in use by the Board at any given time;
(6) "Actuary" means the actuary or firm of actuaries employed
by the Board at any given time;
(7) "Beneficiary" means any person named by a member to receive
any benefits as provided for by Section 901 et seq. of this title.
If there is no beneficiary living at time of member employee's
death, the member's estate shall be the beneficiary;
(8) "Board" means the Oklahoma Public Employees Retirement
System Board of Trustees;
Req. No. 16491 Page 76

RBH No. 16491
(9) "Compensation" means all salary and wages, as defined by
the Board of Trustees, including amounts deferred under deferred
compensation agreements entered into between a member and a
participating employer, but exclusive of payment for overtime,
payable to a member of the System for personal services performed
for a participating employer but shall not include compensation or
reimbursement for traveling, or moving expenses, or any compensation
in excess of the maximum compensation level, provided:
(a) For compensation for service prior to January 1, 1988,
the maximum compensation level shall be Twenty-five
Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) per annum.
For compensation for service on or after January 1,
1988, through June 30, 1994, the maximum compensation
level shall be Forty Thousand Dollars ($40,000.00) per
annum.
For compensation for service on or after July 1, 1994,
through June 30, 1995, the maximum compensation level
shall be Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) per
annum; for compensation for service on or after July
1, 1995, through June 30, 1996, the maximum
compensation level shall be Sixty Thousand Dollars
($60,000.00) per annum; for compensation for service
on or after July 1, 1996, through June 30, 1997, the
maximum compensation level shall be Seventy Thousand
Req. No. 16491 Page 77

RBH No. 16491
Dollars ($70,000.00) per annum; and for compensation
for service on or after July 1, 1997, through June 30,
1998, the maximum compensation level shall be Eighty
Thousand Dollars ($80,000.00) per annum. For
compensation for services on or after July 1, 1998,
there shall be no the effective date of this act, the
maximum compensation level for retirement purposes
shall be as prescribed by subparagraph (e) of this
paragraph.
(b) Compensation for retirement purposes shall include any
amount of elective salary reduction under Section 457
of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 and any amount of
nonelective salary reduction under Section 414(h) of
the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.
(c) Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, the
compensation taken into account for any employee in
determining the contribution or benefit accruals for
any plan year is limited to the annual compensation
limit under Section 401(a)(17) of the federal Internal
Revenue Code.
(d) Current appointed members of the Oklahoma Tax
Commission whose salary is constitutionally limited
and is less than the highest salary allowed by law for
his or her position shall be allowed, within ninety
Req. No. 16491 Page 78

RBH No. 16491
(90) days from March 21, 2001, to make an election to
use the highest salary allowed by law for the position
to which the member was appointed for the purposes of
making contributions and determination of retirement
benefits. Such election shall be irrevocable and be
in writing. Reappointment to the same office shall
not permit a new election. Members appointed to the
Oklahoma Tax Commission after the March 21, 2001,
shall make such election, pursuant to this
subparagraph, within ninety (90) days of taking
office.
(e) For participating members of the System on or after
the effective date of this act, the maximum
compensation level shall be the first Ninety Thousand
Dollars ($90,000.00) of the regular annual
compensation of the member or the regular annual
compensation of the member on the effective date of
this act, whichever is greater. For members who join
the System on or after the effective date of this act,
the maximum compensation level shall be the first
Ninety Thousand Dollars ($90,000.00) of the regular
annual compensation of the member;
(10) "Credited service" means the sum of participating service,
prior service and elected service;
Req. No. 16491 Page 79

RBH No. 16491
(11) "Dependent" means a parent, child, or spouse of a member
who is dependent upon the member for at least one-half (1/2) of the
member's support;
(12) "Effective date" means the date upon which the System
becomes effective by operation of law;
(13) "Eligible employer" means the state and any county, county
hospital, city or town, conservation districts, circuit engineering
districts and any public or private trust in which a county, city or
town participates and is the primary beneficiary, is to be an
eligible employer for the purpose of Section 901 et seq. of this
title only, whose employees are covered by Social Security and are
not covered by or eligible for another retirement plan authorized
under the laws of this state which is in operation on the initial
entry date. Emergency medical service districts may join the System
upon proper application to the Board. Provided, affiliation by a
county hospital shall be in the form of a resolution adopted by the
board of control.
(a) If a class or several classes of employees of any
above-defined employers are covered by Social Security
and are not covered by or eligible for and will not
become eligible for another retirement plan authorized
under the laws of this state, which is in operation on
the effective date, such employer shall be deemed an
eligible employer, but only with respect to that class
Req. No. 16491 Page 80

RBH No. 16491
or those classes of employees as defined in this
section.
(b) A class or several classes of employees who are
covered by Social Security and are not covered by or
eligible for and will not become eligible for another
retirement plan authorized under the laws of this
state, which is in operation on the effective date,
and when the qualifications for employment in such
class or classes are set by state law; and when such
class or classes of employees are employed by a county
or municipal government pursuant to such
qualifications; and when the services provided by such
employees are of such nature that they qualify for
matching by or contributions from state or federal
funds administered by an agency of state government
which qualifies as a participating employer, then the
agency of state government administering the state or
federal funds shall be deemed an eligible employer,
but only with respect to that class or those classes
of employees as defined in this subsection; provided,
that the required contributions to the retirement plan
may be withheld from the contributions of state or
federal funds administered by the state agency and
transmitted to the System on the same basis as the
Req. No. 16491 Page 81

RBH No. 16491
employee and employer contributions are transmitted
for the direct employees of the state agency. The
retirement or eligibility for retirement under the
provisions of law providing pensions for service as a
volunteer firefighter shall not render any person
ineligible for participation in the benefits provided
for in Section 901 et seq. of this title. An employee
of any public or private trust in which a county, city
or town participates and is the primary beneficiary
shall be deemed to be an eligible employee for the
purpose of Section 901 et seq. of this title only.
(c) All employees of the George Nigh Rehabilitation
Institute who elected to retain membership in the
System, pursuant to Section 913.7 of this title, shall
continue to be eligible employees for the purposes of
Section 901 et seq. of this title. The George Nigh
Rehabilitation Institute shall be considered a
participating employer only for such employees.
(d) All employees of CompSource Mutual Insurance Company
who retain membership in the Oklahoma Public Employees
Retirement System pursuant to Section 913.9 of this
title shall continue to be eligible employees for the
purposes of the Oklahoma Public Employees Retirement
System. CompSource Mutual Insurance Company shall be
Req. No. 16491 Page 82

RBH No. 16491
considered a participating employer only for such
employees.
(e) All employees of a successor organization, as defined
by Section 5-60.12 of Title 2 of the Oklahoma
Statutes, who retain membership in the Oklahoma Public
Employees Retirement System pursuant to Section 5-
60.35 of Title 2 of the Oklahoma Statutes shall
continue to be eligible employees for the purposes of
the Oklahoma Public Employees Retirement System. A
successor organization shall be considered a
participating employer only for such employees.
(f) A participating employer of the Teachers' Retirement
System of Oklahoma, who has one or more employees who
have made an election pursuant to enabling legislation
to retain membership in the System as a result of
change in administration, shall be considered a
participating employer of the Oklahoma Public
Employees Retirement System only for such employees;
(14) "Employee" means any officer or employee of a
participating employer, whose employment is not seasonal or
temporary and whose employment requires at least one thousand
(1,000) hours of work per year and whose salary or wage is equal to
the hourly rate of the monthly minimum wage for state employees.
For those eligible employers outlined in Section 910 of this title,
Req. No. 16491 Page 83

RBH No. 16491
the rate shall be equal to the hourly rate of the monthly minimum
wage for that employer. Each employer, whose minimum wage is less
than the state's minimum wage, shall inform the System of the
minimum wage for that employer. This notification shall be by
resolution of the governing body.
(a) Any employee of the county extension agents who is not
currently participating in the Teachers' Retirement
System of Oklahoma shall be a member of this System.
(b) Eligibility shall not include any employee who is a
contributing member of the United States Civil Service
Retirement System.
(c) It shall be mandatory for an officer, appointee or
employee of the office of district attorney to become
a member of this System if he or she is not currently
participating in a county retirement system. Provided
further, that if an officer, appointee or employee of
the office of district attorney is currently
participating in such county retirement system, he or
she is ineligible for this System as long as he or she
is eligible for such county retirement system. Any
eligible officer, appointee or employee of the office
of district attorney shall be given credit for prior
service as defined in this section. The provisions
outlined in Section 917 of this title shall apply to
Req. No. 16491 Page 84

RBH No. 16491
those employees who have previously withdrawn their
contributions.
(d) Eligibility shall also not include any officer or
employee of the Oklahoma Employment Security
Commission, except for those officers and employees of
the Commission electing to transfer to this System
pursuant to the provisions of Section 910.1 of this
title or any other class of officers or employees
specifically exempted by the laws of this state,
unless there be a consolidation as provided by Section
912 of this title. Employees of the Oklahoma
Employment Security Commission who are ineligible for
enrollment in the Oklahoma Employment Security
Commission Retirement Plan, that was in effect on
January 1, 1964, shall become members of this System.
(e) Any employee employed by the Legislative Service
Bureau, Senate or House of Representatives for the
full duration of a regular legislative session shall
be eligible for membership in the System regardless of
classification as a temporary employee and may
participate in the System during the regular
legislative session at the option of the employee.
For purposes of this subparagraph, the determination
of whether an employee is employed for the full
Req. No. 16491 Page 85

RBH No. 16491
duration of a regular legislative session shall be
made by the Legislative Service Bureau if such
employee is employed by the Legislative Service
Bureau, the Senate if such employee is employed by the
Senate, or by the House of Representatives if such
employee is employed by the House of Representatives.
Each regular legislative session during which the
legislative employee or an employee of the Legislative
Service Bureau participates full time shall be counted
as six (6) months of full-time participating service.
(i) Except as otherwise provided by this
subparagraph, once a temporary session employee
makes a choice to participate or not, the choice
shall be binding for all future legislative
sessions during which the employee is employed.
(ii) Notwithstanding the provisions of division (i) of
this subparagraph, any employee, who is eligible
for membership in the System because of the
provisions of this subparagraph and who was
employed by the Senate or House of
Representatives after January 1, 1989, may file
an election, in a manner specified by the Board,
to participate as a member of the System prior to
September 1, 1989.
Req. No. 16491 Page 86

RBH No. 16491
(iii) Notwithstanding the provisions of division (i) of
this subparagraph, a temporary legislative
session employee who elected to become a member
of the System may withdraw from the System
effective the day such employee elected to
participate in the System upon written request to
the Board. Any such request must be received by
the Board prior to October 1, 1990. All employee
contributions made by the temporary legislative
session employee shall be returned to the
employee without interest within four (4) months
of receipt of the written request.
(iv) A member of the System who did not initially
elect to participate as a member of the System
pursuant to this subparagraph shall be able to
acquire service performed as a temporary
legislative session employee for periods of
service performed prior to the date upon which
the person became a member of the System if:
a. the member files an election with the System
not later than December 31, 2000, to
purchase the prior service; and
b. the member makes payment to the System of
the actuarial cost of the service credit
Req. No. 16491 Page 87

RBH No. 16491
pursuant to subsection A of Section 913.5 of
this title. The provisions of Section 913.5
of this title shall be applicable to the
purchase of the service credit, including
the provisions for determining service
credit in the event of incomplete payment
due to cessation of payments, death,
termination of employment or retirement, but
the payment may extend for a period not to
exceed ninety-six (96) months;
(15) "Entry date" means the date on which an eligible employer
joins the System. The first entry date pursuant to Section 901 et
seq. of this title shall be January 1, 1964;
(16) "Executive Director" means the managing officer of the
System employed by the Board under Section 901 et seq. of this
title;
(17) "Federal Internal Revenue Code" means the federal Internal
Revenue Code of 1954 or 1986, as amended and as applicable to a
governmental plan as in effect on July 1, 1999;
(18) "Final average compensation" means the average annual
compensation, including amounts deferred under deferred compensation
agreements entered into between a member and a participating
employer, up to, but not exceeding the maximum compensation levels
as provided in paragraph (9) of this section received during the
Req. No. 16491 Page 88

RBH No. 16491
high est three (3) of the last ten (10) years of participating
service immediately preceding retirement or termination of
employment and with respect to members whose first participating
service occurs on or after July 1, 2013, the compensation received
during the highest five (5) of the last ten (10) years of
participating service immediately preceding retirement or
termination of employment. Provided, no member shall retire with a
final average compensation unless the member has made the required
contributions on such compensation, as defined by the Board of
Trustees;
(19) "Fiscal year" means the period commencing July 1 of any
year and ending June 30 of the next year. The fiscal year is the
plan year for purposes of the federal Internal Revenue Code;
however, the calendar year is the limitation year for purposes of
Section 415 of the federal Internal Revenue Code;
(20) "Fund" means the Oklahoma Public Employees Retirement Fund
as created by Section 901 et seq. of this title;
(21) "Leave of absence" means a period of absence from
employment without pay, authorized and approved by the employer and
acknowledged to the Board, and which after the effective date does
not exceed two (2) years;
(22) "Member" means an eligible employee or elected official
who is in the System and is making the required employee or elected
official contributions, or any former employee or elected official
Req. No. 16491 Page 89

RBH No. 16491
who shall have made the required contributions to the System and
shall have not received a refund or withdrawal;
(23) "Military service" means service in the Armed Forces of
the United States by an honorably discharged person during the
following time periods, as reflected on such person's Defense
Department Form 214, not to exceed five (5) years for combined
participating and/or prior service, as follows:
(a) during the following periods, including the beginning
and ending dates, and only for the periods served,
from:
(i) April 6, 1917, to November 11, 1918, commonly
referred to as World War I,
(ii) September 16, 1940, to December 7, 1941, as a
member of the 45th Division,
(iii) December 7, 1941, to December 31, 1946, commonly
referred to as World War II,
(iv) June 27, 1950, to January 31, 1955, commonly
referred to as the Korean Conflict or the Korean
War,
(v) February 28, 1961, to May 7, 1975, commonly
referred to as the Vietnam era, except that:
a. for the period from February 28, 1961, to
August 4, 1964, military service shall only

Req. No. 16491 Page 90

RBH No. 16491
include service in the Republic of Vietnam
during that period, and
b. for purposes of determining eligibility for
education and training benefits, such period
shall end on December 31, 1976, or
(vi) August 1, 1990, to December 31, 1991, commonly
referred to as the Gulf War, the Persian Gulf
War, or Operation Desert Storm, but excluding any
person who served on active duty for training
only, unless discharged from such active duty for
a service-connected disability;
(b) during a period of war or combat military operation
other than a conflict, war or era listed in
subparagraph (a) of this paragraph, beginning on the
date of Congressional authorization, Congressional
resolution, or Executive Order of the President of the
United States, for the use of the Armed Forces of the
United States in a war or combat military operation,
if such war or combat military operation lasted for a
period of ninety (90) days or more, for a person who
served, and only for the period served, in the area of
responsibility of the war or combat military
operation, but excluding a person who served on active
duty for training only, unless discharged from such
Req. No. 16491 Page 91

RBH No. 16491
active duty for a service-connected disability, and
provided that the burden of proof of military service
during this period shall be with the member, who must
present appropriate documentation establishing such
service.
An eligible member under this paragraph shall include only those
persons who shall have served during the times or in the areas
prescribed in this paragraph, and only if such person provides
appropriate documentation in such time and manner as required by the
System to establish such military service prescribed in this
paragraph, or for service pursuant to subdivision a of division (v)
of subparagraph (a) of this paragraph those persons who were awarded
service medals, as authorized by the United States Department of
Defense as reflected in the veteran's Defense Department Form 214,
related to the Vietnam Conflict for service prior to August 5, 1964;
(24) "Normal retirement date" means the date on which a member
may retire with full retirement benefits as provided in Section 901
et seq. of this title, such date being whichever occurs first:
(a) the first day of the month coinciding with or
following a member's:
(1) sixty-second birthday with respect to members
whose first participating service occurs prior to
November 1, 2011, or

Req. No. 16491 Page 92

RBH No. 16491
(2) sixty-fifth birthday with respect to members
whose first participating service occurs on or
after November 1, 2011, or with respect to
members whose first participating service occurs
on or after November 1, 2011, who reach a minimum
age of sixty (60) years and who also reach a
normal retirement date pursuant to subparagraph c
of this paragraph,
(b) for any person who initially became a member prior to
July 1, 1992, and who does not reach a normal
retirement date pursuant to division (1) of
subparagraph (a) of this paragraph, the first day of
the month coinciding with or following the date at
which the sum of a member's age and number of years of
credited service total eighty (80); such a normal
retirement date will also apply to any person who
became a member of the sending system as defined in
Section 901 et seq. of this title, prior to July 1,
1992, regardless of whether there were breaks in
service after July 1, 1992,
(c) for any person who became a member after June 30,
1992, but prior to November 1, 2011, and who does not
reach a normal retirement date pursuant to division
(1) of subparagraph (a) of this paragraph, the first
Req. No. 16491 Page 93

RBH No. 16491
day of the month coinciding with or following the date
at which the sum of a member's age and number of years
of credited service total ninety (90),
(d) in addition to subparagraphs (a), (b) and (c) of this
paragraph, the first day of the month coinciding with
or following a member's completion of at least twenty
(20) years of full-time-equivalent employment as:
(i) a correctional or probation and parole officer
with the Department of Corrections and at the
time of retirement, the member was a correctional
or probation and parole officer with the
Department of Corrections,
(ii) a correctional officer, probation and parole
officer or fugitive apprehension agent with the
Department of Corrections who is in such position
on June 30, 2004, or who is hired after June 30,
2004, and who receives a promotion or change in
job classification after June 30, 2004, to
another position in the Department of
Corrections, so long as such officer or agent has
at least five (5) years of service as a
correctional officer, probation and parole
officer or fugitive apprehension agent with the
Department, has twenty (20) years of full-time-
Req. No. 16491 Page 94

RBH No. 16491
equivalent employment with the Department and was
employed by the Department at the time of
retirement,
(iii) a firefighter with the Military Department of the
State of Oklahoma either employed for the first
time on or after July 1, 2002, or who was
employed prior to July 1, 2002, in such position
and who makes the election authorized by division
(2) of subparagraph b of paragraph (9) of
subsection A of Section 915 of this title and at
the time of retirement, the member was a
firefighter with the Military Department of the
State of Oklahoma, and such member has at least
twenty (20) years of credited service upon which
the two and one-half percent (2 1/2%) multiplier
will be used in calculating the retirement
benefit,
(iv) a public safety officer employed by the Grand
River Dam Authority for the first time on or
after July 1, 2016,
(v) a deputy sheriff or jailer employed by any county
that is a participating employer in the System
for the first time as a deputy sheriff or jailer
on or after November 1, 2020, or
Req. No. 16491 Page 95

RBH No. 16491
(vi) beginning November 1, 2024, a deputy sheriff or
jailer employed by any county that is a
participating employer in the System for the
first time as a deputy sheriff or jailer before
November 1, 2020, including those who make the
election authorized by division (2) of
subparagraph b of paragraph (10) of subsection A
of Section 915 of this title, and at the time of
retirement, if the member was a deputy sheriff or
jailer employed by the participating county, and
such member has at least twenty (20) years of
credited service upon which the two and one-half
percent (2 1/2%) multiplier will be used in
calculating the retirement benefit,
(e) for those fugitive apprehension agents who retire on
or after July 1, 2002, the first day of the month
coinciding with or following a member's completion of
at least twenty (20) years of full-time-equivalent
employment as a fugitive apprehension agent with the
Department of Corrections and at the time of
retirement, the member was a fugitive apprehension
agent with the Department of Corrections, or
(f) for any member who was continuously employed by an
entity or institution within The Oklahoma State System
Req. No. 16491 Page 96

RBH No. 16491
of Higher Education and whose initial employment with
such entity or institution was prior to July 1, 1992,
and who without a break in service of more than thirty
(30) days became employed by an employer participating
in the Oklahoma Public Employees Retirement System,
the first day of the month coinciding with or
following the date at which the sum of the member's
age and number of years of credited service total
eighty (80);
(25) "Participating employer" means an eligible employer who
has agreed to make contributions to the System on behalf of its
employees;
(26) "Participating service" means the period of employment
after the entry date for which credit is granted a member.
Provided, on or after the effective date of this act, military
service credit purchased under Section 913.8 of this title shall
only be considered "participating service" if such service is
immediately preceded by a period of employment with a participating
employer and followed by a return to service as an employee with the
same or another participating employer within ninety (90) days
immediately following discharge from such military service;
(27) "Prior service" means the period of employment of a member
by an eligible employer prior to the member's entry date for which
credit is granted a member under Section 901 et seq. of this title.
Req. No. 16491 Page 97

RBH No. 16491
Prov ided, on or after the effective date of this act, "prior
service" shall also include service purchased under Section 913.8 of
this title which does not meet the requirements of paragraph 26 of
this section;
(28) "Retirant" or "retiree" means a member who has retired
under the System;
(29) "Retirement benefit" means a monthly income with benefits
accruing from the first day of the month coinciding with or
following retirement and ending on the last day of the month in
which death occurs or the actuarial equivalent thereof paid in such
manner as specified by the member pursuant to Section 901 et seq. of
this title or as otherwise allowed to be paid at the discretion of
the Board;
(30) "Retirement coordinator" means the individual designated
by each participating employer through whom System transactions and
communication shall be directed;
(31) "Social Security" means the old-age survivors and
disability section of the federal Social Security Act;
(32) "Total disability" means a physical or mental disability
accepted for disability benefits by the federal Social Security
System;
(33) "Service-connected disability benefits" means military
service benefits which are for a service-connected disability rated

Req. No. 16491 Page 98

RBH No. 16491
at t wenty percent (20%) or more by the Veterans Administration or
the Armed Forces of the United States;
(34) "Elected official" means a person elected to a state
office in the legislative or executive branch of state government or
a person elected to a county office for a definite number of years
and shall include an individual who is appointed to fill the
unexpired term of an elected state official;
(35) "Elected service" means the period of service as an
elected official;
(36) "Limitation year" means the year used in applying the
limitations of Section 415 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986,
which year shall be the calendar year; and
(37) "Public safety officers of the Grand River Dam Authority"
means those persons hired by the Grand River Dam Authority on or
after March 21, 2001, who are certified by the Council on Law
Enforcement Education and Training or an equivalent certifying
entity for law enforcement personnel training and who perform law
enforcement functions as part of their regularly assigned duties and
responsibilities on a full-time basis. With respect to any public
safety officer hired by the Grand River Dam Authority on or after
March 21, 2001, any earned benefits or credits toward retirement
benefits from previous participation within the Oklahoma Public
Employees Retirement System or the Oklahoma Law Enforcement
Retirement System shall remain within that system.
Req. No. 16491 Page 99

RBH No. 16491
SECTION 15. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 919.1, as
amended by Section 4, Chapter 280, O.S.L. 2024 (74 O.S. Supp. 2024,
Section 919.1), is amended to read as follows:
Section 919.1. (1) Employee contributions to the System shall
be:
(a) for employees except as otherwise provided in
paragraphs (b), (c), (d), (e), (f) and (g) of this
subsection: beginning July 1, 2006 on the effective
date of this act, and thereafter, three and one-half
percent (3.5%) for the first Ninety Thousand Dollars
($90,000.00) of allowable annual compensation or, for
a member who is a participating member of the System
on the effective date of this act, three and one-half
percent (3.5%) of the allowable annual compensation of
the employee on the effective date of this act,
whichever is greater;
(b) for correctional officers and probation and parole
officers employed by the Department of Corrections:
beginning July 1, 1998, and thereafter, and for
correctional officers or probation and parole officers
who are in such position on June 30, 2004, or who are
hired after June 30, 2004, and who receive a promotion
or change in job classification after June 30, 2004,
to another position in the Department of Corrections,
Req. No. 16491 Page 100

RBH No. 16491
so long as such officers have at least five (5) years
of service as a correctional officer or probation and
parole officer, eight percent (8%), beginning on the
effective date of this act, for the first Ninety
Thousand Dollars ($90,000.00) of allowable
compensation as provided in paragraph (9) of Section
902 of this title or, for correctional officers and
probation and parole officers who are participating
members of the System on the effective date of this
act, eight percent (8%) of allowable compensation the
member is receiving on the effective date of this act,
whichever is greater, as provided in paragraph (9) of
Section 902 of this title;
(c) for fugitive apprehension agents who are employed with
the Department of Corrections on or after July 1,
2002, and for fugitive apprehension agents who are in
such position on June 30, 2004, or who are hired after
June 30, 2004, and who receive a promotion or change
in job classification after June 30, 2004, to another
position in the Department of Corrections, so long as
such agents have at least five (5) years of service as
a fugitive apprehension agent, eight percent (8%),
beginning on the effective date of this act, for the
first Ninety Thousand Dollars ($90,000.00) of
Req. No. 16491 Page 101

RBH No. 16491
allowable compensation as provided in paragraph (9) of
Section 902 of this title or, for fugitive
apprehension agents who are participating members of
the System on the effective date of this act, eight
percent (8%) of allowable compensation the member is
receiving on the effective date of this act, whichever
is greater, as provided in paragraph (9) of Section
902 of this title;
(d) for firefighters of the Oklahoma Military Department
first employed beginning July 1, 2002, and thereafter,
and such firefighters who performed service prior to
July 1, 2002, for the Oklahoma Military Department and
who make the election authorized by division (1) of
subparagraph b of paragraph (9) of subsection A of
Section 915 of this title who perform service on or
after July 1, 2002, in such capacity, eight percent
(8%), beginning on the effective date of this act, for
the first Ninety Thousand Dollars ($90,000.00) of
allowable compensation as provided in subsection (9)
of Section 902 of this title or, for firefighters of
the Oklahoma Military Department who are participating
members of the System on the effective date of this
act, eight percent (8%) of allowable compensation the
member is receiving on the effective date of this act,
Req. No. 16491 Page 102

RBH No. 16491
whichever is greater, as provided in paragraph (9) of
Section 902 of this title;
(e) beginning on the effective date of this act, for all
public safety officers of the Grand River Dam
Authority as defined by paragraph (37) of Section 902
of this title, eight percent (8%) for the first Ninety
Thousand Dollars ($90,000.00) of allowable
compensation as provided in paragraph (9) of Section
902 of this title or, for public safety officers of
the Grand River Dam Authority who are participating
members of the System on the effective date of this
act, eight percent (8%) of allowable compensation the
member is receiving on the effective date of this act,
whichever is greater, as provided in paragraph (9) of
Section 902 of this title;
(f) for deputy sheriffs and county jailers employed by any
county that is a participating employer in the System
for the first time as a deputy sheriff or jailer on or
after November 1, 2020, or beginning November 1, 2024,
those deputy sheriffs and county jailers employed by
any county that is a participating employer in the
System for the first time as a deputy sheriff or
county jailer before November 1, 2020, eight percent
(8%), beginning on the effective date of this act, for
Req. No. 16491 Page 103

RBH No. 16491
the first Ninety Thousand Dollars ($90,000.00) of
allowable compensation as provided in paragraph (9) of
Section 902 of this title or, for deputy sheriffs and
county jailers who are participating members of the
System on the effective date of this act, eight
percent (8%) of allowable compensation the member is
receiving on the effective date of this act, whichever
is greater, as provided in paragraph (9) of Section
902 of this title; and
(g) beginning on the effective date of this act, for all
employees except those who make contributions pursuant
to paragraphs (b), (c), (d), (e), and (f) of this
subsection who make an irrevocable written election
pursuant to paragraph (2) of subsection A of Section
915 of this title: six and forty-one one-hundredths
percent (6.41%) for the first Ninety Thousand Dollars
($90,000.00) of allowable annual compensation or, for
employees who are participating members of the System
on the effective date of this act, except those who
make contributions pursuant to paragraphs (b), (c),
(d), (e), and (f) of this subsection who make an
irrevocable written election pursuant to paragraph (2)
of subsection A of Section 915 of this title: six and
forty-one one-hundredths percent (6.41%) of allowable
Req. No. 16491 Page 104

RBH No. 16491
annual compensation the member is receiving on the
effective date of this act, whichever is greater.
The contributions required by paragraphs (b), (c), (e), and (f)
of this subsection shall be made by a member for not more than
twenty (20) years and thereafter shall be as provided in paragraph
(a) of this subsection.
(2) Contributions shall be deducted by each state agency by the
participating employer for such benefits as the Board is authorized
to administer as provided for by law. Employee and employer
contributions shall be remitted monthly, or as the Board may
otherwise provide, to the Executive Director for deposit in the
Oklahoma Public Employees Retirement Fund.
(3) Each participating employer shall pick up under the
provisions of Section 414(h)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986
and pay the contribution which the member is required by law to make
to the System for all compensation earned after December 31, 1988.
Although the contributions so picked up are designated as member
contributions, such contributions shall be treated as contributions
being paid by the participating employer in lieu of contributions by
the member in determining tax treatment under the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986 and such picked up contributions shall not be
includable in the gross income of the member until such amounts are
distributed or made available to the member or the beneficiary of
the member. The member, by the terms of this System, shall not have
Req. No. 16491 Page 105

RBH No. 16491
any option to choose to receive the contributions so picked up
directly and the picked up contributions must be paid by the
participating employer to the System.
Member contributions which are picked up shall be treated in the
same manner and to the same extent as member contributions made
prior to the date on which member contributions were picked up by
the participating employer. Member contributions so picked up shall
be included in gross salary for purposes of determining benefits and
contributions under the System.
The participating employer shall pay the member contributions
from the same source of funds used in paying salary to the member,
by effecting an equal cash reduction in gross salary of the member.
(4) By September 1, 1989, the System shall refund the
accumulated employee contributions of any member who elects to
retain the member's membership in the Teachers' Retirement System of
Oklahoma, in accordance with Section 17-104 of Title 70 of the
Oklahoma Statutes, to such member. Upon the refund of the
accumulated employee contributions referred to in this subsection,
all benefits and rights accrued to such member are terminated.
SECTION 16. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 920, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 920. (1) Effective July 1, 1994, every state agency
which is a participating employer shall contribute to the System an
amount equal to eleven and one-half percent (11 1/2%) of the monthly
Req. No. 16491 Page 106

RBH No. 16491
comp ensation of each member, but not in excess of Forty Thousand
Dollars ($40,000.00).
(2) Effective July 1, 1995, every state agency which is a
participating employer shall contribute to the System an amount
equal to eleven and one-half percent (11 1/2%) of the monthly
compensation of each member, not to exceed the allowable annual
compensation as defined in paragraph (9) of Section 902 of this
title.
(3) Effective July 1, 1996, every state agency which is a
participating employer shall contribute to the System an amount
equal to twelve percent (12%) of the monthly compensation of each
member, not to exceed the allowable annual compensation defined in
paragraph (9) of Section 902 of this title.
(4) Effective July 1, 1999, and through the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2005, every state agency which is a participating employer
shall contribute to the System an amount equal to ten percent (10%)
of the monthly compensation of each member, not to exceed the
allowable annual compensation defined in paragraph (9) of Section
902 of this title.
(5) Effective July 1, 2005 Beginning on the effective date of
this act, except as otherwise provided by subsection (11) of this
section, every state agency which is a participating employer shall
contribute an amount to the System equal to a percentage of monthly
compensation of each member, not to exceed the allowable annual
Req. No. 16491 Page 107

RBH No. 16491
comp ensation defined in paragraph (9) of Section 902 of this title
as follows:
July 1, 2005 – June 30, 2006 11 1/2%
July 1, 2006 – June 30, 2007 12 1/2%
July 1, 2007 – June 30, 2008 13 1/2%
July 1, 2008 – June 30, 2009 14 1/2%
July 1, 2009 – June 30, 2011 15 1/2%
July 1, 2011 – June 30, 2012
and each year thereafter 16 1/2%
for the first Ninety Thousand Dollars ($90,000.00) or, for a member
who is a participating member of the System on the effective date of
this act, for his or her current monthly salary on the effective
date of this act, whichever is greater.
(6) The Board shall certify, on or before November 1 of each
year, to the Office of Management and Enterprise Services an
actuarially determined estimate of the rate of contribution which
will be required, together with all accumulated contributions and
other assets of the System, to be paid by each participating
employer to pay all liabilities which shall exist or accrue under
the System, including amortization of the past service cost over a
period of not to exceed forty (40) years from June 30, 1987, and the
cost of administration of the System, as determined by the Board,
upon recommendation of the actuary.

Req. No. 16491 Page 108

RBH No. 16491
(7) The Office of Management and Enterprise Services and the
Governor shall include in the budget and in the budget request for
appropriations the sum required to satisfy the state's obligation
under this section as certified by the Board and shall present the
same to the Legislature for allowance and appropriation.
(8) Each other participating employer shall appropriate and pay
to the System a sum sufficient to satisfy the obligation under this
section as certified by the Board.
(9) Each participating employer is hereby authorized to pay the
employer's contribution from the same fund that the compensation for
which said contribution is paid from or from any other funds
available to it for such purpose.
(10) Forfeitures arising from severance of employment, death or
for any other reason may not be applied to increase the benefits any
member would otherwise receive under the System's law. However,
forfeitures may be used to reduce an employer's contribution.
(11) Effective November 1, 2015, an employer shall be required
to make payment to the Oklahoma Public Employees Retirement System
of the amount described by subsection A of Section 10 of this act
with respect to any employee who is a participant in the defined
contribution system created pursuant to the provisions of Sections 1
through 11 of this act. The employer shall be required to make the
required matching contribution amount for all employees that
participate in the defined contribution system and to remit the
Req. No. 16491 Page 109

RBH No. 16491
diff erence between such amount and the amount the employer would
otherwise have paid pursuant to the provisions of this section to
the Oklahoma Public Employees Retirement System.
(12) On or after the effective date of this act, any amount of
money not required for purposes of the employer contribution
otherwise provided by this section, whether for purposes of the
defined benefit plan created pursuant to Sections 901 et seq. of
this title or for matching employer contributions as provided for in
the Retirement Freedom Act pursuant to Section 935.1 et seq. of this
title, shall be transferred to the Special Cash Fund to be used for
such purposes as may be provided by law including, but not limited
to, any purpose prescribed by an appropriation measure enacted
during any regular or extraordinary session of the Legislature.
SECTION 17. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3801 of Title 62, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Each year the Office of Management and Enterprise Services shall
determine the median salary amount for all of the participating
members of the Uniform Retirement System for Justices and Judges,
the Oklahoma Teachers' Retirement System, and Oklahoma Public
Employees Retirement System. The salary amount with respect to
which employer contributions are to be made, pursuant to Sections 9,
12, and 16 of this act, shall be increased to equal the median
salary amount for the participating members of that System. The
Req. No. 16491 Page 110

RBH No. 16491
revi sed salary amount shall become effective on the July 1 date
immediately following the date as of which the Office of Management
and Enterprise Services makes its official determination of the
increase, if any, in the salary amount. No modifications shall be
made to the salary amount if the median salary amount for
participating members of that System is less than Ninety Thousand
Dollars ($90,000.00).
SECTION 18. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
The provisions of this act are severable, and if any part or
provision hereof shall be void, invalid, or unconstitutional, the
decision of the court so holding shall not affect or impair any of
the remaining parts or provisions hereof, and the remaining
provisions hereof shall continue in full force and effect.
SECTION 19. If the Emergency Clause is not approved pursuant to
the requirements of the Oklahoma Constitution as part of this
measure, the effective date of Section 1 of this act shall be
October 1, 2026.
SECTION 20. If the Emergency Clause is not approved pursuant to
the requirements of the Oklahoma Constitution as part of this
measure, the effective date of Sections 2 through 18 of this act
shall be November 1, 2026.
SECTION 21. Except as otherwise provided by Section 19 of this
act, Section 1 of this act shall become effective immediately upon
Req. No. 16491 Page 111

RBH No. 16491
sign ature by the Governor or as otherwise provided by Section 58 of
Article V of the Oklahoma Constitution.
SECTION 22. Except as otherwise provided by Section 20 of this
act, Sections 2 through 18 of this act shall become effective July
1, 2026.
SECTION 23. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-2-16491 CMA 02/18/26













Req. No. 16491 Page 112